Europe     Economic Review:  EASTERN EUROPE Vol.III, No. 01, 
07 January 1994 

   Notice to Readers:  FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a subtitled series 
published by FBIS Europe/Lat in America Group.  The Survey series 
features brief summaries of foreign media reports on topical issues 
that are compiled from the most recent sources available to FBIS. 
Unless otherwise identified as introduction and/or comment by FBIS 
staff, all comment or analysis contained herein is attributable to 
the cited media source. 

   Europe Economic Review is a subseries of FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY 
published by the East and West Europe divisions of Europe/Latin 
America Group with contributions from FBIS overseas bureaus.  Europe 
Economic Review is intended to supplement coverage of European 
economic issues in the FBIS Daily Reports for East and West Europe 
and other FBIS publications.  Foreign news, feature, and editorial 
reports selected for summary in this publication normanlly do not 
appear as full-text translations in other FBIS publications. 

   The contents of Europe Economic Review consist of abstracts of 
foreign media coverage of European economic developments under two 
main geographic headings: 

   -- Western Europe:  Drawing on West European, Canadian, and 
Turkish media, this section reports on national and regional 
economic issues, focusing on economic competitiveness, key 
industries, regional economic integration, internal economic 
policies and performance, and foreign trade and investment. 

   -- Eastern Europe:  Citing East European and, where appropriate, 
other foreign media sources, this section highlights East European 
efforts to rebuild national economies and achieve integration into 
the European Community and the global economy, focusing on policy 
debates and practical action geared toward the implementation of 
internal economic reforms and industrial restructuring and on 
developments in foreign trade, cooperation, and investment from 
national and regional perspectives. 

   Under these two main headings, summaries of foreign media reports 
on all categories of economic issues are generally grouped under 
subheadings by subject country or region. 

   FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a U.S. Government publication.  Its 
contents in no way represent the policies, views, or attitudes of 
the U.S. Government. 

   INTRODUCTION 

   This issue of EUR0PE ECONOMIC REVIEW spotlights Poland for an 
East European case study on how local media have reported on issues 
of Western aid and lending during 1993.  The goal is to illustrate 
recent Polish media perceptions of key issues and developments 
related to Western foreign aid and financial assistance in support 
of economic reform and restructuring in Poland and the rest of 
Eastern Europe. 

   This issue is divided into two segments: 

   --A brief regional section consisting of examples of how selected 
Polish media have reported on Western aid and lending to Eastern 
Europe as a whole. 

   --A longer section devoted solely to Polish media coverage of 
Western aid and lending to Poland. 

   In both sections, abstracts of longer press reports are grouped 
under two main subject headings: 

   --Grants and Technical Assistance -- covering all forms of 
bilateral and multilateral donations from governments, business 
groups, or international organizations to promote economic reform 
and restructuring, including both direct grants in aid and technical 
assistance. 

   --International Lending and Financial Assistance -- encompassing 
all types of lending and financial assistance (including external 
debt relief) by Western governments, Western commercial banks, 
international organizations, and international financial 
institutions. 

   Media summaries in this issue are drawn from full-text Polish 
sources, including some which were previously published by FBIS and 
others which were not previously disseminated.  All summaries 
attributed to the Polish news agency PAP are based on original wire- 
filed material processed simultaneously by FBIS field bureaus.  The 
majority of summaries in this issue that cite press sources were 
extracted more recently from Polish periodicals archived at FBIS 
headquarters.  All items are arranged chronologically and cover the 
period January through December 1993. 

   Editorial Note:  For the purposes of this special issue, the 
editors have retained the term "EC" or European Community when 
referencing media reports on European Union (EU) assistance to 
Poland or Eastern Europe that were published before 1 November 1993 

   -- the date on which the '1Maastricht Treaty" of European Union 
entered into force.  The term EU is reserved for summaries of all 
other material published after 1 November or in cases where texts 
discuss future conditions. 

   REGIONAL 

   GRANTS AND TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE 

   SUMMING UP PHARE ACHIEVEMENTS:  In late June, the Polish foreign 
trade journal RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE ran a full-page feature, consisting 
of four articles, that reviewed the accomplishments of the EC's 
PHARE program of economic restructuring assistance throughout 
Eastern Europe since its inception in 1989.  The journal drew most 
of the information used in this feature from documents published by 
the EC Commission.  The feature listed the names, addresses, phone 
and fax numbers of government officials in charge of overseeing 
PHARE aid in all of the East European countries. 

   Originally designed as an assistance program for Poland and 
Hungary only (PHARE -- French abbreviation for "Economic 
Restructuring Assistance to Poland and Hungary"), the program now 
covers most of Eastern Europe.  PHARE initiatives are in place in 
Albania, Bulgarian, Czechia, Estonia, Hungary, Latvia, Lithuania, 
Poland, Romania, Slovakia, and Slovenia.  The EC runs a separate 
restructuring and technical assistance program for the former Soviet 
Union -- TACIS (Technical Assistance to the Commonwealth of 
Independent States and Georgia). 

   The main objective of the PHARE program is to provide technical 
assistance that will promote privatization and restructuring in the 
recipient countries, paving the way for increased foreign direct 
investment.  In Poland, for example, PHARE aid was instrumental in 
helping to finalize Fiat's acquisition of the Polish FSM automotive 
plant.  PHARE provided funds to hire consultants who put together 
the package of legal and economic paperwork that enabled both Fiat 
and FSM to bring their negotiations to a successful conclusion at 
the end of 1992, when Fiat committed itself to buy 90 percent of 
FSM's stock. 

   Since 1989, the PHARE program has disbursed 3.340 billion ECU to 
all East European recipient countries, according to RYNKI 
ZAGRANICZNE.  In most cases, national foreign investment agencies in 
the recipient countries manage the distribution of assistance and 
the awarding of contracts. 

   PHARE also comprises subsidiary programs providing other kinds of 
economic assistance.  The JOPP program, for example, underwrites 
bank loans to finance East-West joint ventures.  PHARE also delivers 
direct assistance to the banking sector in some East European 
countries.  In Slovenia, for example, where the government does not 
yet have the administrative support to oversee distribution of PHARE 
aid, PHARE is giving direct assistance to Slovenian banks as a part 
of a drive to reform the trade payments system. 

   The RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE feature on PHARE also included a table that 
summarized aid to the principal recipient countries.  The data in 
the table were current as of January 1993.  An edited version of 
this table appears below. 

   Poland 

   Role and Scope of Program -- Privatization and restructuring 
assistance (since 1991). 

   Responsible National Agency -- National Foreign Investment 
Agency. 

   Agency Program Goals -- Founded in April 1992, the NFIA seeks to 
attract foreign investors to Poland and to assist them in buying 
stock in Polish firms slated for privatization.  The NFIA also 
assists the Polish government in legal matters related to foreign 
investment. 

   PHARE Technical Support -- PHARE pays for the hiring of 
consultants under short and long-term contracts to aid in luring 
direct foreign investment to Poland. 

   Hungary 

   Role and Scope of Program -- Foreign investment promotion and 
export sales development (February 1992). 

   Responsible National Agency -- Investment and Trade Promotion 
Agency of the Ministry of Foreign Economic Relations. 

   Agency Program Goals -- The program is designed to support all 
new foreign investment and encourage increased export sales in 
specific sectors. 

   PHARE Technical Support -- PHARE provides specialized consultants 
and subsidizes Agency costs in running foreign investment promotion 
programs. 

   Czech Republic 

   Role and Scope of Program -- Privatization and economic 
restructuring (1992). 

   Responsible National Agency -- Czech Foreign Investment Agency 
(Czechinvest) of the Ministry of Industry and Trade. 

   Agency Program Goals -- Founded in October 1990, the Agency 
matches foreign investors with appropriate partners in the Czech 
Republic. 

   PHARE Technical Support -- The PHARE program supporting this 
Agency began in the first quarter of 1993.  The program is a 
continuation of earlier efforts dating from 1991.  PHARE provides 
consultants, pays for training courses, and supports various 
promotional campaigns. 

   Slovak Republic 

   Role and Scope of Program -- Privatization and economic 
restructuring (1992). 

   Responsible National Agency -- Slovak National Agency for Foreign 
Investment and Development of the Ministry of Privatization. 

   Agency Program Goals -- Founded in 1991 as governmental body, the 
Agency is now semi-autonomous.  The Agency aims to promote foreign 
investment and open up new areas of industrial cooperation. 

   PHARE Technical Support --  PHARE support consists of consulting 
services, training for Agency personnel, and support for foreign 
investment promotion campaigns. 

   Romania 

   Role and Scope of Program -- Privatization and economic 
restructuring (1992). 

   Responsible National Agency -- Romanian Development Agency of the 
Council for Economic Reform Policy. 

   Agency Program Goals -- Founded by the government in March 1991, 
the Agency is described as an autonomous, public institution.  It is 
chartered to assist the government in defining and executing 
policies aimed at encouraging direct foreign investment. 

   PHARE Technical Support -- Implementation of the PHARE program 
for Romania started in first quarter of this year.  The program 
provides for consulting services, Agency personnel training, and 
support for foreign investment promotion campaigns. 

   Bulgaria 

   Role and Scope of Program -- Privatization and economic 
restructuring (1992). 

   Responsible National Agency -- Ministry of Industry and Trade. 
   Agency Program Goals -- No information. 

   PHARE Technical Support -- Based on provisions of 1991 
privatization laws, PHARE support was due to begin in the first 
quarter of 1993.  Initial efforts were to be focused on funding a 
study of privatization problems and on the delivery of consulting 
services. 

   Estonia, Latvia, Lithuania 

   Role and Scope of Program -- Privatization and economic 
restructuring (1992). 

   Responsible National Agencies -- To be determined. 

   Agency Program Goals -- Based on government studies and 
recommendations, PHARE aid funds should be spent on problemsolving 
in areas of legislation and institution building. 

   PHARE Technical Support -- PHARE experts are to provide 
troubleshooting services in solving legal and institutional 
problems.  Each country to receive one PHARE consultant.  Specific 
projects were due to commence in second quarter of this year. 
(Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 24 Jun 92 p 6) 

   'TRIANGULAR' EC AID TO CIS MAY BENEFIT EAST EUR0PEANS:  In an 
August  survey article on the EC's TACIS aid program for the former 
Soviet Union, the Polish foreign trade journal RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE 
noted that the program would yield dividends for East European 
vendors.  TACIS (Technical Assistance to the Commonwealth of 
Independent States and Georgia) is a version of the EC's PHARE 
program tailored to the needs of the former USSR. 

   TACIS reportedly contains new elements that allow East European 
suppliers to bid on contracts for goods and services paid for by the 
EC as technical assistance to the CIS.  East European bidders would 
be competing against other bidders in both EC member countries and 
the CIS.  The EC Council has ruled that East European contractors 
will be permitted to bid on projects covered by up to 10 percent of 
the TACIS annual budget.  Contract acceptance hinges on the approval 
of recipient countries, however.  The 1993 TACIS budget was valued 
at a reported 510 million ECU. 

   RYNKI ZAGEANICZNE pointed out that Poland had long sought EC 
approval for this kind of "triangular" assistance.  (Warsaw RYNKI 
ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 26 Aug 93 p 3) 

   NORWEGIAN AID TO REGION:  Norway planned to spend $62 million on 
aid to Central and Eastern Europe and Russia during 1993.  By the 
end of June, Oslo had donated $47 million to fund 487 projects in 
countries throughout the region.  Around $23 went for aid to the 
private sector and various infrastructure projects.  Norway donated 
about $8 million for environmental assistance.  Russia will account 
for about $14 million in Norway's regional aid budget.  (Warsaw 
RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 11 Sep 93 p 1) 

   EC CHAMBERS OF COMMERCE TAP PHARE, AID EASTERN CHAMBERS:  In late 
September, the "Eurochambers PHARE Working Group" organized a two- 
day conference in Warsaw to discuss its stewardship of technical 
assistance programs to Eastern Europe funded by PHARE.  The Polish 
Chamber of Commerce hosted the program, and representatives of the 
national chambers of commerce from Romania, Slovakia, and Hungary 
also attended. 

   Founded 35 years ago, Eurochambers is an association of national 
chambers of commerce from 24 European countries representing 1,200 
local chamber chapters and 13 million companies.  During the Warsaw 
meeting, Eurochambers vice president, Robert De Vilder (president of 
the Amsterdam Chamber of Commerce and Industry), announced that he 
would introduce a motion in 1994 to admit the Polish, Czech, Slovak 
and Hungarian chambers to the association. 

  Eurochambers is managing three technical assistance programs for 
Eastern Europe that have a combined budget of about ECU 1 million. 
These funds are reportedly additional to the PHARE budgets approved 
by the EC Commission for individual East European recipient 
countries.  One program is already in operation, while the two other 
initiatives are due to get underway in 1994. 

   --The MERCURE PHARE program (annual budget - ECU 250,000) pays 
for the travel of 50 officials from East European chambers of 
commerce on two-week orientation visits with EC chambers. 

   --Beginning in 1994, the "Workshops" program (projected annual 
budget -- ECU 120,000) will finance training seminars for chamber of 
commerce officials in Eastern Europe.  Training will be geared 
toward general subjects of business self-regulation. 

   --The third and newest program is called "Industrial Training 
Attachments."  Billed as a pilot program for Visegrad countries 
only, Eurochambers will arrange business training courses for East 
European middle managers in the food processing, electronics, 
woodworking, footwear, and construction industries. 

   Eurochambers also plans to organize a "sister" organization 
program with East European chambers.  (Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in 
Polish 30 Sep 93 p 8) 

   GERMANY ANNOUNCES BUDGET FOR CONSULTING AID TO REGION:  The 
German federal government has approved plans to spend DM 322 million 
on technical consulting services for Central and Eastern Europe, 
according to Poland's foreign commercial office in Cologne. 

   Funding for this technical assistance package will be shared 
among 14 federal ministries.  The largest appropriations are 
earmarked for the Federal Ministry of the Economy (DM 59.2 million), 
the Ministry of Finance (DM 37.2 million), and the Ministry of 
Foreign Economic Cooperation (DM 83.4).  The Ministry of the Economy 
will coordinate the consulting assistance program in close 
cooperation with the Kreditanstalt fuer Wiederaufbau.  (Warsaw RYNKI 
ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 14 Oct 93 p 1) 

   INTERNATIONAL LENDING AND FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE 

   JOURNAL NOTES IMF ANNUAL REPORT ON EASTERN EUROPE:  In late 
September, the Polish foreign trade journal RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE ran a 
front-page story on "the latest IMF report," which described the 
institution's financial position and lending patterns for 1992.  The 
IMF report noted that, while a member quota increase had boosted the 
organization's capital, lending declined in 1992 due to improved 
economic conditions in many developing countries, especially in 
Latin America. 

   RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE highlighted the fact that Eastern Europe and 
the former Soviet Union accounted for the bulk of the IMF's lending 
in 1992.   Although total IMF lending dropped from 8.1 billion SDR 
in 1991 to 3.2 billion SDR in 1992, the countries of Central and 
Eastern Europe received the most -- 2 billion SDR.  The IMF loaned 
most of the remaining 1.2 billion SDR to Peru, Jamaica, and 
Zimbabwe.  The IMF report noted that demand for IMF loans in Eastern 
Europe and the former Soviet Union was lower than expected for 1992. 

   RYNKI ZAGEANICZNE predicted that the region would continue to be 
the IMF's principal client in 1993.  The paper recounted the IMF's 
temporary lending facility of 1.1 billion SDR extended to Russia and 
Kirghizstan in April of this year.  (Warsaw RThKI ZAGRANICZNE in 
Polish 18 Sep 93 p 1) 

   EBRD EYES AID TO STEEL SECTOR:  The EBRD plans to make 
restructuring loans available to selected East European iron and 
steel enterprises, according to RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE. 

   In a recap of debate among Western industry experts at the 
European Steel Conference held in Luxemburg in September, RThKI 
noted that Western efforts to erect barriers to East European steel 
imports are offset by the calls of some Western experts for the West 
to furnish aid that would ease downsizing and restructuring in the 
East European steel sector.  The paper quoted EBRD's Christopher 
Beauman, who said that Western protectionism will undermine East 
European steel restructuring programs.  Another conference 
participant, Roger Collins from the UK consulting firm W.S. Atkins, 
urged the West to focus assistance on vocational retraining for East 
European steel workers.  Otherwise, said Collins, East European 
governments may wind up repeating the mistakes of the EC in the 
l98Os, when around 40 billion ECU in subsidies were pumped into the 
West European steel industry to prop up firms and employment 
artificially. 

   The EBRD reportedly intends to begin screening East European iron 
and steel mills that "stand a chance of being able to go it alone" 
and provide them with loans to aid restructuring.  The EBRD would do 
so by participating in the industry restructuring programs proposed 
by various regional governments.  (Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in 
Polish 21 Sep 93 p 3) 

   EIB FORESEES INCREASED LENDING TO REGION:  In late September, Sir 
Brian Unwin, president of the EC's EIB pledged additional resources 
for the pool of capital earmarked for long-term lending to Eastern 
Europe, according to RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE. 

   The EC finance ministers have approved EIB plans to lend 3 
billion ECU to the region over the next three years.  An earlier 
allocation for Eastern Europe of 1.7 billion ECU has already been 
exhausted.  At the beginning of September, the bank loaned 1.3 
billion ECU to Bulgaria, the Czech Republic, Hungary, Poland, 
Romania, and Slovakia.  Future lending programs will also include 
Albania and the three Baltic states. 

   Unwin noted another factor that will contribute to greater EIB 
activity in Central and Eastern Europe.  He believes that Austria's 
entry into the EC would facilitate greater EIB lending in the area 
due to its historic links with the region as a whole.  (Warsaw RYNKI 
ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 25 Sep 93 p 1) 

   POLAND 

   GRANTS AND TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE 

   PHARE AID HISTORY:  Poland has been participating in the EC's 
PHARE program since 1990.  From 1990 through 1992 Poland's annual 
share of total PHARE funding has been 200 million ECU.  In 1993, 
Poland's allotment was raised to 225 million ECU.  (Warsaw GAZETA 
PRZEMYSLOWA I HANDLOWA in Polish No 41, 13-19 Oct 93 p 3) 

   UK KNOW-HOW SUPPORT FOR LOCAL GOVERNMENT:  The UK's "Know-How 
Fund" announced in January that it would launch two new technical 
training initiatives to assist Polish local governments.  One 
project involved setting up a land-use planning training program by 
Llewellyn Davies of London and the Krakow Insitute for Land-use 
Planning and Municipal Services Management.  The other project was 
to concentrate on providing training for business development 
through a cooperative business training program run by Chesterton 
International of Bristol and the Foundation for the Promotion of 
Social and Economic Initiatives in Warsaw.  (Warsaw PAP in English 
2313 GMT 15 Jan 93) 

   KNOW-HOW SUPPORT TO UK INVESTORS:  The UK's "Know-How Fund" 
offers grants of up to 50,000 pounds to pay for pre-investment 
feasibility studies by UK firms exploring long-term joint ventures 
or greenfield investments in Poland.  Prospective UK investors may 
apply for the grants to cover up to 50 percent of the costs of such 
feasibility studies. (Warsaw PAP in English 1357 GMT 28 Jan 93) 

   WORLD BANK GRANT PAYS RAIL REFORM CONSULTING FEES:  As a result 
of negotiations in early February between the ministries of 
transport and finance and World Bank representatives, the World Bank 
agreed to pay the consulting fees of U.S. experts that will advise 
Poland on the restructuring of the Polish State Railroads 
corporation.  After the consultants completed their study, Warsaw 
planned to apply for a World Bank loan to finance the restructuring 
program.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2147 GMT 5 Feb 93) 

   PHARE AID TO PRIVATE FARMING:  According to a bilateral agreement 
signed in February, the EC, working through PHARE, will provide 
Poland with 18 million ECU to aid development in the private farming 
sector.  Most of these funds will go to pay for West European 
technical advisers and consultants traveling to Poland to furnish 
technical assistance in the privatization of state-owned farms. 
Poland's Rural Property Agency will receive 5 million ECU to finance 
costs associated with the putting liquidated state farms up for 
privatization.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1551 GMT 11 Feb 93) 

   ACCORD WITH EC ON ENVIRONMENTAL AID:  On 11 March, Poland and the 
EC signed a memorandum acknowledging an EC commitment to provide 
Poland with 18 million ECU in environmental protection assistance. 
The aid would be channeled through the EC's PHARE program.  The 
program would break down to 5 million ECU for assistance in 
implementing Polish environmental policy, 12 million ECU for 
specific projects, and 1 million ECU for technical support.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 2036 GMT 11 Mar 93) 

   JAPANESE ENVIRONMENTAL AID:  A Japanese IAEA official visiting 
Poland in April for a scientific conference announced that the Tokyo 
government will provide funding to promote a new air pollution 
control technology that has been tested successfully at a Polish 
thermal power plant. 

   The IAEA's deputy general director, Sueo Machi, said that the 
Japanese government will set aside $625,000 to finance costs 
associated with travel of Japanese experts to Poland and Polish 
specialists to Japan.  Their aim will be encourage wider use of a 
new emissions control technology developed in a pilot project at the 
Kaweczyn thermal power plant in Poland.  The project was a joint 
venture funded by the Polish government, the Polish power industry, 
and the IAEA.  American and German engineering firms also donated 
monitoring equipment for the Kaweczyn experiment, which involved use 
of electron-beam technology to scrub sulfur dioxide and nitrogen 
oxide from the plant's emissions.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1919 GMT 
25 Mar 93; Warsaw RYNKI ZAGEANICZNE in Polish 20 Apr 93 p 5) 

   U.S. SUPPORT FOR SMALL BUSINESS:  In late May, RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE 
published an in-depth feature on a U.S. funded program to promote 
small business development in Poland. 

   Advertising a forthcoming three-day training seminar for Polish 
small and medium-sized businesses on techniques to promote export 
sales, the author of the feature provided background on the U.S. aid 
program supporting the seminar's sponsor -- the Warsaw Small 
Business Consulting Center.  The Warsaw center is one of three 
centers in Poland funded by the Polish-American Small Business 
Development Foundation.  The foundation emerged from the East 
European aid initiative (SEED) launched by the U.S. Congress in 1990 
and is patterned after a similar U.S. domestic program.  The 
Foundation was chaired by Andrzej Arendarski, foreign trade minister 
in the Suchocka government, and it receives additional funding from 
the Polish National Chamber of Commerce. 

   The three Polish consulting centers in Warsaw, Lodz, and Gdansk 
specialize in both training and troubleshooting business problems of 
small and medium-sized firms.  The U.S.-trained Polish staff, many 
of whom are associated with local universities, offer training 
courses in marketing, capital project analysis, business plan 
development, taxation, financial management, and bookkeeping.  They 
also handle walk-in requests for direct assistance and referrals in 
solving ad hoc business problems.  (Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in 
Polish 22 May 93 p 7) 

   EC RURAL AID FUND APPROVES NEW SUBSIDIES:  On 27 May, the 
"European Fund for the Development of Rural Poland" approved a grant 
of 30 billion zlotys ($1.8 million) to subsidize various 
infrastructure projects in rural areas.  For the past three years, 
the Fund has been providing grants and low-interest loans to aid the 
construction of schools, health care centers, waste disposal sites, 
and utilities in rural Poland.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1454 GMT 27 
May 93) 

   SWEDISH TRADE FAIR GROUP AIDS EXPORTERS:  The Stockholm 
International Trade Fair organization, Scandinavia's largest trade 
fair group, is assisting Polish firms to exhibit products at the 
approximately 40 trade shows on its annual program.  The Fair 
reportedly provides a number of free services to Polish exhibitors 
and offers substantial discounts on shipping and accommodation 
costs.  (Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 3 Jun 93 p 2) 

   PHARE AID FOR ANTITRUST AGENCY HELD UP:  While in Brussels in 
early June to discuss various issues with the EC Commission, Anna 
Fornalczyk, head of Poland's "Anti-Monopoly Office," complained 
about delays in the disbursement of promised PHARE aid for her 
agency.  According to Fornalczyk, the EC acted earlier in the year 
to tap the PHARE budget for around 500,000 ECU ($600,000) to support 
the "demonopolization of the Polish economy."  Fornalczyk said her 
office had been waiting in vain since February for disbursement of 
the funds.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2113 GMT 7 Jun 93) 

   EC'S STRUDER, SIERRA PROGRAMS ADVANCE:  On 7 June, Polish and EC 
officials signed documents to lay the groundwork for implementation 
in Poland of two EC aid programs for Eastern Europe with a total 
value of 80 million ECU (around $96 million). 

   Poland's minister for European integration and foreign aid, Jan 
K. Bielecki, and EC ambassador to Poland A. Dijkmeester signed a 
memorandum on the financing of the STRUDER (Structural Development 
in Selected Regions) program.  Poland's share of the STRUDER program 
involves receipt of aid valued at around 60 million ECU ($80 
million) to support economic restructuring in areas plagued by 
excessively high unemployment.  Half of this sum is to be spent on 
direct startup aid for new private businesses, while the other half 
will go to regional institutions promoting local economic 
development.  In May, Warsaw approved the charter of the "Polish 
Regional Development Agency" that will coordinate implementation of 
the STRUDER program.  Officials predicted the first disbursements 
would occur in the fall of 1993. 

   STRUDER restructuring grants will be targeted primarily on new 
small business development in high unemployment areas.  According to 
press acccounts of the progam's rules, firms employing up to 100 
persons would become eligible for direct grants to cover up to 25 
percent of expansion and modernization project costs.  However, the 
total cost of individual projects may not exceed $525,000. 

   The two officials also signed papers authorizing the initiation 
in Poland of the EC's three-year program -- SIERRA -- to finance 
work on bringing East European legislation into line with EC laws. 
The program will also fund training for East European civil servants 
in the principles of the European Union treaty.  The EC has 
appropriated 20 million ECUs for SIERRA.  (Warsaw PAP in English 
1628 GMT 7 Jun 93; Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 20 May 93 p 1, 
8-10 Jun 93 p 1) 

   PHARE GRANT FOR NEW LITHUANIAN BORDER CROSSING:  The EC 
contributed 2.5 million ECU toward defraying the $15-million cost of 
building a new border crossing station at Szypiliszki on the 
Lithuanian border, according to an agreement signed by Polish and EC 
officials in Warsaw on 8 June.  The funds come out of the PHARE 
budget and support a priority PHARE program to advance the "Via 
Baltica" project -- a modernized transportation network linking the 
Baltic States with Western Europe.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1139 GMT 
8 Jun 93) 

   FINNISH GRANT FROM STABILIZATION FUND:  In late June, Finland 
became the eighth donor country to release its share of the former 
zloty stabilization fund for use as aid in other areas.  On 24 June, 
the press spokesman for the Polish Finance Ministry announced that 
the Finnish government had earmarked its share of the fund -- around 
3 million Finnish marks -- as a contribution to Poland's Bank 
Privatization Fund.  Owing to its successful stabilization policies 
in recent years, Poland did not have to draw on the zloty 
stabilization standby fund -- originally totaling $1 billion -- 
formed by 17 Western countries in 1989.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1713 
GMT 24 Jun 93) 

   PHARE AID AND VAT IMPLEMENTATION:  In a 6 July statement from the 
EC Commission praising Poland's introduction of a value-added tax on 
5 July, an EC official gave credit to the PHARE program for helping 
to smooth the way for the implementation of the new tax.  In the 
statement, EC tax commissioner Christiane Scrivener cited the role 
of PHARE aid in helping to pay for the large-scale public 
information campaign designed to educate the Polish public about how 
the new tax program will work.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1358 GMT 5 
Jul 93) 

   EC LEADS IN ENVIRONMENTAL AID:  During a July press conference, 
an official from the Environmental Protection Ministry briefed 
reporters on Polish investment in environmental projects, including 
those funded with various types of Western aid. 

   Michal Wilczynski, undersecretary of state in the ministry, noted 
that Poland is spending about $1 billion annually on environmental 
protection projects.  He said that less than 3 percent of this sum 
consists of foreign assistance. 

   Since 1990, Poland has received a total of $233 million in 
various types of subsidies and grants from 13 international 
organizations and countries, including the EC, the World Bank, the 
U.S., Japan, and nine other individual European countries.  The aid 
received has been invested in 198 projects, according to Wilczynski. 
   The EC has provided Poland with the largest amount of 
environmental aid in this period, Wilczynski pointed out.  EC 
environmental aid since 1990 has totaled $92,872,000, which was 
allocated to 37 projects.  The number of funded environmental 
protection projects has declined from 20 in 1990, to 14 in 1991, to 
3 in 1992.  The EC supplied most of this aid under the auspices of 
the PHARE program, with funding and projects broken down into three 
annual "phases" for 1990-1992.  As of August 1993, it was uncertain 
whether any PHARE money would be allocated to environmental aid 
projects before the end of this year.  A planning office in Poland's 
Environmental Protection Ministry had proposed "phase four" PHARE 
initiatives worth about 45 million ECU. 

   Wilczynski stressed that in the environmental area too Poland 
needs freer access to foreign markets more than it does direct 
foreign aid in order to obtain resources needed for environmental 
protection projects.  (Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 1 Jul 93 p 
2, 26 Aug 93 p 3) 

   GDANSK TO HOST 1994 EU TRADE PROMOTION SHOW:  In August, Polish 
business groups and EC officials reached agreement on the selection 
of Gdansk as the site for the 1994 "Europartneriat" trade show.  For 
the past five years, the European Commission's DG XXIII has been 
funding these trade shows designed to promote trade among European 
small and medium-sized businesses.  The 1994 Europartneriat will be 
the first in this series of annual trade shows to be held outside 
the EC.  Approximatey 400 small business representatives from the 
EC, EFTA, the CIS, and Eastern Europe are expected to attend the 
1994 event.  The Gdansk Chamber of Commerce estimates the total cost 
of the fair to be around 2 million ECU, most of which will be 
covered by the EU.  (Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 21 Aug 93 p 
1, 11 Sep 93 p 1) 

   STRUDER GRANT TO L0DZ AREA ANNOUNCED:  In August, the head of the 
Lodz Regional Development Agency announced that the Lodz region 
would receive 16 million ECU ($19 million) in aid under the EC's 
STRUDER regional development program.  Most of the money will go to 
assist the startup of small and medium-sized businesses.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 1529 GMT 19 Aug 93; Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in 
Polish 21 Aug 93 p 2) 

   SPECIALISTS RATE PHARE-FUNDED ENVIRONMENTAL PROJECTS:  In August, 
officials from the Environmental Protection Ministry shared with 
RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE their assessments of the three most important 
environmental aid programs financed by the EC's PHARE program.  All 
of those interviewed agreed that PHARE aid was most effective in 
funding the following three projects: 

   --Air Quality Control -- Installation of fluidized bed coal 
burning technology at the RAFAKO plant in Raciborz (cost:  $7.5 
million). 

   --Watershed Protection -- An ongoing regional program to upgrade 
water and sewage management in Upper Silesia (cost: approximately $6 
million). 

   --Natural Resources Protection -- A regional land-use management 
plan covering the Mazurian Lakes district, including funding for a 
Mazurian Lakes environmental protection foundation (cost:  $2.8 
million under PHARE phases one and two).  (Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE 
in Polish 26 Aug 93 p 3) 

   EC APPROVES EXPORT AID PROGRAM:  In September, the EC Commission 
approved counterpart funding through the PHARE budget for a Polish 
export promotion program (EXPROM) that would be coordinated by 
Poland's National Chamber of Commerce (KIG).  EXPROM managers and 
consultants hope that the program will make strong contributions 
toward the further "integration of the Polish and West European 
economies." 

   EXPROM is designed to channel financial assistance to a wide 
range of export boosting activities, including direct aid to 
exporting firms and subsidies to build up the country's "export 
infrastructure."  KIG's general manager Marek Klockzko and former 
foreign trade minister Andrzej Arendarski will head up the EXPROM 
program in Poland.  Kloczko believes that up to 200 Polish companies 
will be eligible for EXPROM aid.  Potential beneficiary firms will 
be asked to submit export sales promotion plans for competitive 
evaluation by EXPROM.  Local chambers of commerce will canvass their 
areas for candidate companies invited to submit applications for 
assistance.  EXPROM aid will probably be focused on selected 
sectors.  However, the program's management had not yet decided as 
of early September which sectors would be selected. 

   EXPROM officials stress that assistance to exporting firms will 
be technical, not financial.  Direct assistance funding will be used 
to hire consultants, which will advise exporters on ways to improve 
their product lines and develop more effective marketing programs. 

   The program has a total budget of 12 million ECU, with 10 million 
ECU supplied by Brussels and 2 million ECU in matching funds or 
goods and services to be furnished by Poland.  EXPROM managers and 
consultants stated that the program and budget are designed to run 
for about 19 months through the end of 1994.  They intend to seek 
additional funding for the future if EXPROM is successful. 

   RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE reported extensively on EXPROM during the 
summer and fall of this year.  (Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 7 
Sep 93p 3, 31 Aug 93p 1, 3 Aug 93p 2, 29 Jul 93 pp 3,4) 

   WESTERN ANTITRUST AID:  Poland's antitrust enforcement agency -- 
known officially in Poland as the "Anti-Monopoly Bureau" -- has been 
receiving various forms of Western assistance over the past few 
years. 

   The UK Know How Fund has donated around 100,000 pounds worth of 
assistance since 1991.  The antitrust agency has received the most 
aid in the form of travel grants for training in the UK and visits 
to Poland by British experts in antitrust matters.  This year, the 
Know How Fund paid for 14 Polish antitrust officials to attend six- 
week training courses in the UK.  Another seven officials are 
expected to go on similar training tours next year.  In September, 
the Fund donated a collection of books to the agency's library. 

   The U.S. has been sending pairs of antitrust experts to Poland 
for six-month consulting tours with the Anti-Monopoly Bureau. 

   The EC's PHARE program has also been paying for the training of 
Polish antitrust officials.  Every year, around 20-25 officials from 
the Anti-Monopoly Bureau go to Brussels for practical training 
tours.  Warsaw hopes that this training will help to promote the 
harmonization of Polish and EC law in the antitrust area.  (Warsaw 
RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 11 Sep 93 p 2) 

   STRUDER AID AS REMEDY TO LOW WESTERN CREDIT USE:  In a mid- 
September press interview, Jan K. Bielecki, minister for European 
integration issues, commented on the causes of Poland's low 
utilization of Western credit lines for economic assistance. 
Bielecki listed the three bottlenecks which, in his opinion, have 
been the biggest barriers to Western credit absorption, particularly 
by small and medium-sized businesses.  Bielecki stressed that Polish 
and EC officials tailored the EC-financed STRUDER aid program to 
address these specific problems. 

   --Large "Down Payment" Requirements For Small Loans -- The first 
problem Bielecki mentioned as an obstacle to foreign loan absorption 
involved the large equity commitments imposed by Western lenders on 
prospective Polish borrowers.  To qualify for Western commercial 
bank loans tied to specific capital projects, propective Polish 
borrowers have had to put up more of their own money then they can 
afford.  The EC-f inanced STRUDER aid program will help to fill this 
gap, said Bielecki, by providing grants to cover up to 25 percent of 
the total cost of development projects for small and medium-sized 
businesses, which are the focal point of the STRUDER program. 

   --Lender Risk Avoidance -- Bielecki noted that the borrower 
equity barrier is a direct function of a second problem -- the 
reluctance of Western commercial lenders to expose themselves to the 
risks of making loans to Polish small and medium-sized firms.  The 
STRUDER program will help in this area too, according to Bielecki, 
by providing grant money to back loan guarantees for up to 60-70 
percent of a bank's commercial risk exposure on individual business 
loans. 

   --High Cost of Polish Capital -- Bielecki mentioned the high cost 
of domestic capital as the third stumbling block hindering Western 
credit absorption.  Prospective small and medium-sized business 
borrowers find it difficult to afford the interest rates charged by 
Polish commercial banks insofar as they try to borrow money needed 
to meet the equity requirements of Western commercial lenders. 
However, even if all borrowed funds are supplied by a foreign 
lender, Polish borrowers still have to pay loan processing fees and 
service charges to Polish banks that act as intermediaries for 
foreign banks.  The STRUDER program will help in this regard too 
because it would require Polish borrowers to put up only 20 percent 
of the cost of a given project in order to qualify for the 25- 
percent matching contribution from STRUDER.  As a result, Polish 
firms would only have to pay market interest rates on commercial 
loans covering 55 percent of project costs.  Bielecki also noted 
that the government was trying to persuade Polish intermediary banks 
to keep their fee margins to a minimum when processing Western- 
backed loans.  (Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 16 Sep 93 pp 1, 
2) 

   U.S. AID HISTORY REVIEWED:  In late September, RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE 
ran a lengthy feature article by Andrzej Krzemirski profiling U.S. 
aid to Poland since 1989. 

   Krzemirski recounted the tally of total U.S. aid to post- 
communist Poland and summarized the scope and nature of many 
individual aid programs.  Since 1989, wrote Krzemirski, Poland has 
received $4 billion in U.S. aid, including $2.4 billion in debt 
reduction.  He noted that most U.S. aid to Poland is delivered in 
the context of wider regional assistance programs and coordinated by 
USAID. 

   The author profiled several aid programs and advised readers to 
consult the USAID office in Warsaw for details.  In addition to 
democracy-building programs, such as those funded by the National 
Endowment for Democracy, Krzemirski described several U.S. aid 
programs aimed at promoting free-market reforms, including: 

   --IRIS program (Institutional Reform and the Informal Sector) -- 
provides funding for technical assistance in writing legislation 
designed to enhance small, medium-sized business growth. 

   --GEMINI program (Growth and Equity through Microenterprise 
Investment) --  funds technical assistance in promoting the growth 
of financial services. 

   --Volunteer American experts are praised for making a "very 
important" contribution to finance and banking reform. 

   --The Polish American Business Center in Warsaw -- promotes 
bilateral trade and U.S. investment in Poland. 

   --RITE program (Removal of Impediments to Trade) -- funds 
technical assistance on eliminating trade barriers. 

   --CDI program (Capital Development Initiative) -- funds efforts 
to promote bilateral cooperation in the power industry, 
telecommunications, and environmental protection. 

   Krzemirski added a detailed overview of the lending and 
assistance programs managed by the Polish American Enterprise Fund, 
which was founded in 1990 with charter capital of $240 million. 
Krzemirski rated the Fund as the U.S. government's principal aid 
channel to Poland.  He described the history of the Fund's direct 
and indirect lending and assistance programs to promote 
privatization and private sector growth and cited several of the 
Fund's training and education programs in Poland. 

   Krzemirski concluded his feature with a wrap-up on private and 
public U.S. initiatives in the technical advice and consulting 
arena.  He listed several American programs in this area, including 
the Polish Business Advisory Service, Masters of Business 
Administration Corps, Polish-American Small Business Advisory 
Centers, International Executive Service Corps, and the Citizens 
Democracy Corps.  (Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 18 Sep 93 p 6) 

   NEW EC BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM:  In late September, RYNKI 
ZAGRANICZNE described another EC assistance program for small and 
medium-sized business development, which was about to get under way 
in northeastern Poland. 

   The new EC program -- called COACHTING -- is intended to 
complement collateral initiatives in Poland, such as EXPROM and 
STRUDER, by providing financial assistance to private or privatized 
companies to help them become more competitive in the domestic and 
foreign markets.  EC experts affiliated with COACHTING intended to 
begin disbursing aid before the end of September to around 30 firms 
in the Bialystok, Lomza, and Suwalki areas of northeastern Poland. 
(Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 21 Sep 93 p 1) 

   STRUDER TERMED FIRST AID TO REACH SILESIAN PROVINCE:  In an 
October press interview, the head of the regional development agency 
in Walbrzych province in southwestern Poland said that funds from 
the EC's STRUDER intitiative would be the first Western aid to reach 
his province. 

   According to the Walbrzych agency head, Andrzej Walen, STRUDER 
aid for the Walbrzych area would total 16 million ECU.  Of this 
figure, 10.7 million ECU would go toward direct subsidies to aid the 
startup of small and medium-sized businesses.  The balance would be 
allocated to fund training and consulting services and small public 
works projects. 

   The STRUDER project in Walbrzych was first announced in January. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1944 GMT 28 Jan 93; Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE 
in Polish 7 Oct 93 p 5) 

   AID RECIPIENTS FACE VAT TAX COMPLICATIONS:  In October, the 
Finance Ministry responded to complaints from foreign aid recipients 
about the need to pay VAT taxes on goods and services purchased with 
funds from foreign aid donors.  Many original agreements between 
foreign donors and Polish aid recipients stipulated that grant money 
could not be used to pay any Polish tax, meaning that the aid 
recipients have had to pay VAT out of their own pockets since the 
tax was introduced in July.  While Polish aid beneficiaries wanted 
exemption from VAT on both imported and domestic goods and services, 
the Finance Ministry ordered a suspension of VAT tax collections 
only on imported goods and services.  The Ministry explained that 
the VAT tax law does not permit exemptions at the point of sale. 
(Warsaw RZECZPOSPOLITA in Polish 13 Oct 93 p 15) 

   PHARE AID FOR BANKS ON BAD DEBT WORKOUTS:  Seven state-owned 
commercial banks will receive PHARE-funded assistance in the coming 
months to help them arrange bad debt workout arrangements with 
debtor state-owned companies that submit viable financial 
reorganization plans, according to the Ministry of Finance.  The 
seven banks named by the Ministry are rated as being the most highly 
encumbered by non-performing commercial loans.  The debt 
restructuring initiatives are authorized under legislation passed in 
March defining terms for the financial reorganization of banks and 
state-owned firms. 

   PHARE funding to support the debt workout program will total 5 
million ECU.  Funds are to be used to pay the fees of contractors 
hired to advise the seven banks on technical aspects of commercial 
debt restructuring. 

   All of the participating banks already have signed contracts with 
financial consulting firms.  Five of the seven consulting firms 
hired by bank debt restructuring departments are based in Poland, 
while two are headquartered abroad.  Most of the Polish consultants 
are affiliated with Western firms such as Boston Consulting Group or 
Crown Agents. (Warsaw GAZETA PRZEMYSLOWA I HANDLOWA in Polish No 41, 
13-19 Oct 93 p 3) 

   DANES TO HELP BUILD GDANSK TOURIST INFRASTRUCTURE:  In early 
November, officials from the Danish town of Helsingor and Gdansk 
signed an agreement providing for Danish assistance in developing 
and promoting tourism in Gdansk.  Terms call for the Danes to build 
hotels on the Gdansk coast and assist in the "economic 
restructuring" of Gdansk.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1142 GMT 10 Nov 
93) 

   GERMAN AID CHIEF VISITS WARSAW:  Walter Kittel, head of the 
Chancellry Office for German Aid for Central and Eastern Europe, 
traveled to Warsaw on 1 December for talks with Deputy Premier Marek 
Borowski on future directions in German aid to Poland. 

   Kittel advised that German aid to Eastern Europe, currently 
managed by individual Laender governments, will be centralized at 
the federal level beginning in 1995. 

   Acknowledging the satisfactory course of existing aid programs, 
Kittel and Borowski discussed areas for expanded German assistance 
in the future.  Borowski noted Polish interest in German technical 
assistance in fighting unemployment, labor retraining, social 
insurance reform, and small business development.  Kittel reported 
that Germany wants to assist Poland with programs involving banking 
modernization, control of customs and tax evasion, and the startup 
of a "futures exchange." 

   In a separate meeting with Education Minister Aleksander Luczak, 
Kittel said Germany intended to furnish assistance for the startup 
of a vocational training center in Olsztyn in northeastern Poland. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1643 GMT 1 Dec 93) 

   INTERNATIONAL LENDING AND FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE 

   GOVERNMENT APPROVES FOREIGN LOAN GUARANTEE FORMULA:  Meeting in 
late January, the Polish cabinet's economic policy steering 
committee (KERM) approved a government plan to guarantee bank loans 
to companies and local governments for certain types of capital 
projects.  Individual loans financed with foreign credit lines also 
would be covered up to a value of 15 million ECU.  Coverage would 
apply to 60 percent of a loan's drawn-down value.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 2240 GMT 21 Jan 93) 

   NO SIGN OF WORLD BANK FUNDS FOR UNEMPLOYED:  The Ministry of 
Labor and Social Affairs reported in January that it had no evidence 
that World Bank loans intended to assist the unemployed had ever 
been distributed.  The World Bank mission in Warsaw, on the other 
hand, reported that it had set aside $8.2 million to be used as 
loans in "direct support" of unemployed persons seeking to start 
their own businesses.  (Warsaw RZECZPOSPOLITA in Polish 29 Jan 93 p 
V) 

   EUROPEAN BANKS TO FINANCE SEWAGE PROJECT:  Banks in Luxembourg 
and France reportedly will finance most of the costs associated with 
the construction of a new sewage treatment plant near Warsaw. 
Financing was arranged by the French firm Degremont, which will be a 
partner in the capital project with the Warsaw city government and 
other Polish firms.  The treatment plant will cost around $100 
million, with Warsaw authorities investing around $6.25 million for 
the purchase of the construction site.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1720 
GMT 1 Feb 93) 

   FRENCH STAND ON STABILIZATION FUND RELEASE:  Finance Minister 
Osiatynski travelled to Paris in February to negotiate financial 
assistance issues.  After returning to Warsaw, Osiatynski announced 
conditional French agreement to release $100 million from the 1989 
currency stabilization fund to support restructuring and 
privatization of the country's banking system.  Paris insisted, 
however, that Poland first finalize standby arrangements with the 
IMF. 

   Osiatynski told reporters that seven out of the 18 countries who 
contributed to the stabilization fund had agreed to similar 
releases.  The entire banking reform program would cost around $700- 
$800 million, according to the finance minister.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 2357 GMT 1 Feb 93, 1539 GMT 2 Feb 93) 

   LONDON CLUB TALKS RESUME:  Poland and the London Club group of 
commercial bank creditors resumed negotiations in Vienna on 11 and 
12 February for the first time since June 1991.  The head of the 
Polish negotiating team, Krzysztof Krowacki, told reporters that the 
two sides made "good progress" in the talks and plan to continue 
efforts to find ways to resume Polish commercial debt payments and 
to reduce the total commercial debt service burden -- along lines 
similar to the accord reached with the Paris Club. 

   At the Vienna talks, the London Club negotiators urged Poland to 
resume interest payments on most of its $12 billion commercial debt. 
Krowacki indicated to the press that Poland was willing to make 
payments on 20 percent of the overdue interest.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 2248 GMT 12 Feb 93) 

   PRESSING FOR FASTER, CHEAPER ITALIAN LOANS:  On a visit to Rome 
in late February, Deputy Premier Henryk Goryszewski discussed 
bilateral credit issues with Italian Treasury Minister Piero 
Barucci.  Goryszewski made two proposals: 

   --Establishment of a joint commission to speed processing of 
Polish applications for Italian investment loans. 

   --Action by Rome to move Poland into the lowest country-risk 
category, which would result in a two-percent drop in interest 
charges on Italian capital project loans. 

   The two officials also discussed Poland's low utilization of 
existing Italian credit lines.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1906 GMT 18 
Feb 93) 

   IMF APPROVAL OF REFORM PROGRAM NOTED:  On 8 March, Finance 
Minister Osiatynski told reporters that IMF approval of the 
country's economic "adjustment program" is tantamount to approval of 
the standby arrangement.  If approved in fact, the standby facility 
would allow Poland to receive around $700 million (SDR 476) in five 
tranches to finance external restructuring costs.  The IMF was most 
impressed by Poland's draft "Pact on State Enterprises," according 
to Osiatynski. 

   Speaking to reporters on 15 March, Osiatynski said that the IMF 
had "accepted" the "Polish-IMF standby arrangement," which would 
remain valid through April 1994. 

   Osiatynski travelled to Washington on 16 March for talks with 
U.S. Treasury Secretary Bentsen and IMF and World Bank officials. 
He planned to seek U.S. support for Poland's position in 
negotiations with the London and Paris clubs. 

   Commenting on the IMF decision, one Warsaw editorial writer 
hailed the "heroic efforts" of the government and the "goodwill" of 
the IMF as instrumental in bringing about a renewal of Poland's 
agreement with the IMF.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2015 GMT 8 Mar 93; 
Warsaw GAZETA WYBORCZA in Polish 9 Mar 93 p 1; Warsaw PAP in English 
1802 GMT 15 Mar 93) 

   WORLD BANK PLEDGES MINE RESTRUCTURING LOANS:  The World Bank 
indicated in March that it would offer financial assistance for the 
restructuring of Poland's coal mining sector once the government's 
restructuring program for the industry "gets off the ground." 
Principal World Bank Representative in Warsaw, Ian Hume, made the 
assistance offer to a Polish mining official on 16 March while 
touring a Silesian coal mine. 

   Also on 16 March, the head of the government agency in charge of 
hard coal mining officially unveiled the government's restructuring 
program for the industry at a news conference.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 2243 GMT 16 Mar 93) 

   TELECOMMUNICATIONS RESTRUCTURING UNDER-FINANCED:  While at 
tending a communications trade fair in Lodz in March, Communications 
Minister Krzysztof Kilian told reporters that Poland needs to line 
up more foreign capital to complete the restructuring of the 
nation's telecommunications network.  While Poland has lined up 
loans from the World Bank, EBRD, EIB, Germany, and Spain, it is 
still short of capital needed to pay the estimated $10 billion cost 
of modernizing the country's phone system.  The state 
telecommunications authority -- Telekomunikacja Polska (TP) -- also 
plans to invest in the recapitalization program.  Kilian urged that 
a foreign telecommunications company be invited to bid on shares in 
TP in an effort to fill the financing gap.  (Warsaw PAP in English 
0028 GMT 18 Mar 93) 

   EBRD INVESTS IN FIRST PRIVATE MORTGAGE BANK:  On 23 March, the 
Polish-American Mortgage Bank Inc., Poland's first private bank 
offering home mortgage loans, opened for business.   The bank plans 
to write 15-year mortgages at fixed rates that will cover 60 percent 
of the value of new construction and 50 percent of the value of 
existing housing.  The EBRD and Wielkopolski Credit Bank are listed 
as shareholders in the new bank. 

   Through the following spring and summer, the bank made several 
mortgage loans to individuals, construction companies, housing co- 
ops, and companies.  By November, work was completed on a Warsaw 
subdivision of 13 single-family homes financed by Polish-American 
Mortgage Bank.  The bank reportedly has made loans to finance the 
construction of "several dozen" other houses elsewhere in Poland. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1947 GMT 23 Mar 93, 1424 GMT 22 Nov 93) 

   KOREANS FINANCE TELECOMMUNICATIONS MODERNIZATION:  South Korea's 
Foreign Economic Development Fund and the Export-Import Bank of 
Korea will provide financing for the modernization of the telephone 
system in Poland's Opole province.  The Korean firm Samsung will 
carry out the project, which will involve installation of 12 new 
exchanges and 150,000 new telephone service connections. 

   Korean banking officials told reporters that this is Korea's 
first major economic development loan to Poland.  The Export-Import 
Bank plans to loan $50 million for five years at an annual 
percentage rate of 4.2 percent. 

   The project will take a projected 16 months to complete and was 
due to commence with deliveries of Samsung equipment as soon as 
transaction contracts were signed by the Korea Exchange Bank and 
Polands BIG bank.  (Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 6 Apr 93 p 8) 

   EBRD INVESTS IN MAJOR COMMERCIAL BANK:  In April, the EBRD bought 
up all of the first issue of shares in the privatizing commercial 
bank Wielkopolski Bank Kredytowy (WBK) SA.  WBK is one of the nine 
state-owned commercial banks spun off from the National Bank of 
Poland in 1989.  The share issue, dated 6 April, marked the 
commencement of WBK's privatization. 

   While WBK stock will be offered ultimately to the public, the 
EBRD acquisition is viewed as a "vote of confidence" in Poland and 
its banking system, according to Finance Minister Osiatynski.  The 
EBRD purchase reportedly raised the value of WBK's charter capital 
to about 210 billion zlotys ($13 million).  When privatization is 
completed, EBRD will control about 28 perent of WBK stock.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 1703 GMT 6 Apr 93) 

   EBRD LOAN TALLY:  As of April, EBRD loans to Poland totaled 540 
million ECU (around $270 million), according to the bank's Warsaw 
office.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1733 GMT 14 Apr 93) 

   BANK ADVERTISES WESTERN CREDIT LINES:  In mid-April, RYNKI 
ZAGRANICZNE profiled the full-spectrum of lending programs offered 
by the commercial bank Polski Bank Rozwoju (PBR) SA (Polish 
Development Bank SA), including several programs based on Western 
credit lines. 

   The paper gave a brief overview of five lending programs backed 
by the following Western financial institutions: 

   --European Investment Bank -- PBR SA draws on EIB capital to 
finance capital project loans to private firms, state-owned 
commercial companies, and firms on the verge of privatization. 
Loans are earmarked for various projects in manufacturing, food 
processing, tourism, environmental protection, and energy 
conservation ventures.  Loans are disbursed in ECUs for terms from 
four to 13 years.  Interest rates are fixed and include a profit 
margin for PBR SA and intermediary banks.  The EC's PHARE program 
provides supplementary financing to recapitalize firms that take out 
EBI loans. 

   --World Bank/Privatization and Restructuring -- PBR SA also 
invites privatized or privatizing firms to apply for capital project 
loans funded by the World Bank.  Loans must be earmarked for 
"privatization and restructuring," including expenditures on plant 
expansion and modernization, financing working capital requirements, 
and various management streamlining programs.  Loans are disbursed 
in U.S. dollars or German marks.  Terms are 12 years with grace 
periods not to exceed four years at variable LIBOR/FIBOR rates 
including margins charged by PBR SA and intermediary banks. 

   --World Bank/Small Business -- The World Bank has also opened a 
credit line to support small business development in Poland. 
Privatized or privatizing firms with fewer than 500 employees may 
apply for loans to cover a various costs associated with expansion, 
modernization, working capital financing, and management 
streamlining.  Small businesses may use 100 percent of loan proceeds 
to import foreign goods or to purchase domestic goods directly from 
manufacturers; 80 percent of loan proceeds may be spent on 
consulting services, and only 40 percent of loan proceeds may be 
used to purchase domestic goods from middlemen.  Terms are seven 
years with a maximum grace period of three years.  Disbursements are 
denominated in dollars or marks or, with the consent of PBR SA, in 
any other convertible currency.  Loan amounts are limited to $2 
million per project and $4 million per borrower. 

   --Banco de Sabadell -- This Spanish bank has opened a credit line 
to fund 5-year capital project loans to Polish firms that contract 
to import Spanish-made capital goods.  Loans are disbursed in 
pesetas or ECUs and carry "variable OECD interest rates" plus a 
margin for PBR SA. 

   --Credit National -- This French bank has opened a line of credit 
to meet the financing needs of small and medium-sized French-Polish 
joint ventures.  Firms may use proceeds to import capital goods or 
services from France or to fund working capital requirements. 
Priority is given to projects that boost exports or contribute to 
import substitution.  Loan terms are for up to 10 years.  (Warsaw 
RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 17 Apr 93 p 5) 

   DEBT-FOR-ENVIRONMENT DEAL UPDATED:  In late April, RYNKI 
ZAGRANICZNE published a lengthy overview of the status of Poland's 
debt-for-environment arrangements with the Paris Club.  This feature 
article detailed the history and management of this financing 
package that reduces Poland's official foreign debt by 10 percent in 
exchange for commitments to earmark the savings for spending on 
environmental protection projects. 

   After the agreement covering the debt-for-environment swap was 
concluded with the Paris Club in April 1991, Poland set up the 
"Ekofundusz" (Ecofoundation) in August 1992 to manage set-aside 
funds attributable to the 10-percent debt service relief.  The 
foundation is chartered as a non-governmental organization and 
charged with ensuring the effective outlay of debt-for-environment 
funds. 

   According to RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE, translating the principles of 
debt-for-environment swaps into practice has proven to be difficult 
due to footdragging on the part of most Paris Club members.  The 
paper singled out the United States, however, for being the more 
forthcoming in this regard than other Paris Club members. 
In theory, RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE explained, the Polish government is 
supposed to set aside a sum in its annual budget equivalent to 50 
percent of its principal and interest obligations on foreign 
official debt due in a given year,  Provided that a given Paris Club 
creditor government consents to set aside 20 percent of this 
annualized receivable (10 percent of the total government-to- 
government debt), the funds are deposited in the Ecofoundation's 
account. 

   In practice, recession-plagued Paris Club members have been 
reluctant to consent to this conversion, and, as a result, the 
amount of funding available to the foundation for environmental 
projects in Poland is rated "relatively small."  According to the 
analysis of RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE, Western governments operating on 
reduced budgets see major political risks in forfeiting even a small 
percentage of taxpayer financed loans amid general recession and 
mounting unemployment.  "Even Norway" has renegged on contributing 
its share of debt to the environmental fund.  So far, only the U.S. 
has pledged its full share, while France had "tentatively" agreed to 
put up "1 percent" of its annual receivables on official Polish 
debt. 

   As a result, Ecofoundation managers are making do with far less 
money than they expected and scaling back the number of 
environmental protection projects they had hoped to finance.  If the 
foundation received the full share of funds attributable to a 10- 
percent reduction in Western official debt, it could expect a total 
inflow of around $3 billion.  Western governments reportedly now 
regard a figure of $1 billion to $1.5 billion as "more realistic." 
At present, the foundation has an annual lending budget of around 
100 billion zlotys. 

   While these limitations have forced it to require that loan 
applicants (businesses and institutions) meet stiff eligibility 
conditions, the foundation has nevertheless provided financing for 
several enviromental projects since it was chartered.  From November 
1992 through March 1993, the Ecofoundation approved loans worth 120 
billion zlotys to finance various environmental cleanup projects. 
The most important of these projects involve efforts to control 
sulfur and nitrogen emissions, reduce Baltic Sea pollution, and 
control emissions of "greenhouse effect" gases.  The foundation made 
a supplementary financing loan of 20 billion zlotys to aid in the 
installation of desulfurization equipment at the Skawina power 
plant; the U.S. government has allocated $7.9 million to finance 
most of the cost of this project.  (Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in 
Polish 20 Apr 93 p 5) 

   POLISH CREDIT RATING IMROVES SLIGHTLY:  RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE 
reported a slight improvement in Poland's international 
creditworthiness based on a ranking published in March in the 
financial industry journal INSTITUTIONAL INVESTOR.  Poland's rating 
increased by 2.3 points from the last ranking in September 1992, 
putting it in 69th place on the list of 127 countries.  The Polish 
rating overtook regional competitors Slovenia and Hungary, whose 
credit standings were raised by 2.2 and 2 points respectively.  The 
signing of an IMF accord, improved economic performance, and the 
absence of ethnic strife helped raise Poland's standing.  (Warsaw 
RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 27 Apr 93 p 3) 

   WORLD BANK LOANS FOR BANKING, AGRICULTURE:  On 3 May, the World 
Bank approved two loan packages for Poland totalling $750 million. 
One package consists of $450 million to recapitalize Polish 
commercial banks struggling to restructure the debts of financially 
strapped state-owned companies.  The second package of $300 million 
is for lending to ease the transition of Polish agriculture to a 
market-oriented system.  The terms of both loan agreements call for 
the set-aside of $100 million to service London Club debt.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 1135 GMT 5 May 93) 

   CARPATHIAN 'EUROREGION' NEEDS WESTERN SUPPORT:  In early May, 
RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE reviewed efforts of Poland, Slovakia, Hungary, and 
Ukraine to establish a subregional cooperation entity patterned 
after Western Europe's "Euroregions."  The author of this feature 
stressed that the group -- formed earlier this year -- will not 
meets its ambitious regional development and environmental 
protection goals without Western aid.  Leaders of the Carpathian 
group have contacted the EBRD and other Western foundations to seek 
financial aid.  (Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 11 May 93 p 7) 

   RESUMPTION OF LONDON CLUB DEBT PAYMENTS:  On 11 May, Deputy 
Finance Minister Krzysztof Krowacki told reporters that Poland would 
intended to resume partial payments -- effective 20 May -- on 
interest arrears owed to London Club commercial bank creditors. 
Krowacki cited an agreement reached between Polish and London Club 
negotiators on 6 and 7 May as the grounds for the resumption of 
payments. 

   After suspending service of its London Club debt at the end of 
1989, Poland had previously resumed interest payments on a short- 
term revolving credit facility in February 1993.  The country's 
London Club debt totals around $12 billion. 

Poland hoped to secure a 50-percent reduction in its London Club 
debt in later negotiations with London Club creditors.  Krowacki 
cited U.S. and IMF support for the Polish position as boosting the 
chances for a successful outcome to these negotiations.  At the 6-7 
May meeting, Polish negotiators reportedly tabled three proposals 
for debt reduction.  Under the first option, Poland offered to buy 
back its debt "at a market price."  The other two options involved 
converting London Club debt into "30-year long discount or parity 
bonds."  The London Club's position was unknown beyond a declared 
readiness to reduce the Polish debt "substantially." 

   Terms of the May accord call for Poland to begin repaying 10 
percent of overdue interest -- about $5 million monthly.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 2029 GMT 11 May 93; 1725 GMT 18 Jul 93) 

   IFC ROLE, ACTIVITY PROFILED:  In early June, RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE 
ran a short front-page feature describing the scope and nature of 
IFC activities in Poland. 

   In an interview with RZ, IFC vice president William Ryrie 
clarified the mechanisms and purpose of IFC lending in Eastern 
Europe.  Ryrie underscored that IFC is limited in its ability to 
provide direct financial assistance to small and medium-sized 
private sector businesses.  In Poland, as elsewhere, IFC confines 
itself to making loans in U.S. dollars for larger projects valued in 
excess of $1 million, and it places loans through intermediary banks 
in the recipient countries.  In Poland, for example, the IFC deals 
with Bank Rozwoju Eksportu SA (BRE SA).  However, IFC is helping 
Polish small business indirectly through technical assistance 
projects, according to Ryrie.  For example, he mentioned that IFC 
financing helped to set up the "Polish Business Advisory Service," 
which delivers management consulting services to small and medium- 
sized firms in Poland. 

   The IFC has been active in Poland since 1987 and opened a Warsaw 
office in 1990.  Since 1987, the IFC has disbursed a total of $270 
million to finance 12 capital projects, including the modernization 
and renovation of a Warsaw hotel, the modernization and expansion of 
a consumer electronics plant, the construction of the Warsaw 
Corporate Center, and the modernization of a steel mill in the 
Warsaw area.  Most of these projects involved joint ventures with 
other foreign partners. 

   The IFC plans to expand investment programs in Poland.  Current 
plans envision providing IFC financing for restructuring the PZU 
insurance firm and for road construction throughout the country. 
(Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 3 Jun 93 p 1) 

   DEBT FOR ENVIRONMENT SWAP WITH FINLAND:  In early June, a Polish- 
Finnish task force reached agreement on reducing Poland's $140- 
million debt to Finland by $15 million over the next three years in 
exchange for investment in various environmental cleanup projects. 
The capital can be tapped to finance up to 30 percent of the costs 
of projects, such as a recent one involving the installation of oil- 
spill cleanup gear on board two Polish ships.  Finland holds 0.4 
percent of Poland's total foreign debt.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1033 
GMT 3 Jun 93) 

   BANKERS ANALYZE LOW USE OF WESTERN LOANS:  In early June, Polish 
banking officials (including officers of the National Bank of 
Poland) attended a two-day conference to discuss reasons why the 
Polish economy has been slow to take advantage of loans from Western 
governments and international financial institutions.  The 
conference was organized by the Polish government in cooperation 
with the EBRD, the EC Commission, the Polish National Chamber of 
Commerce, the Polish Industrial Development Agency SA, and UNIDO. 

   The conference also served as a forum for marketing foreign loans 
to Polish businesses.  Representatives from over 1,450 Polish 
manufacturing, construction, trade, service, and consulting firms 
attended the meeting.   During the proceedings, these 
representatives signed a reported 300 loan agreements with officials 
representing foreign financial institutions. 

   Conference participants heard the following breakdown of figures 
describing Poland's low absorption of Western loans: 

   --Declared "loans and grants" since 1990 -- $8.3 billion, 

   --Funds available at end of first quarter 1993 -- $6.1 billion, 

   --Value of signed contracts for loans placed through Polish banks 
at end of first quarter 1993 -- $2.1 million, 

   --Value of loan proceeds disbursements at end of first quarter -- 
"slightly more than half" of $2.1 billion figure. 

   The bankers noted that some Western credit lines expire virtually 
untapped.  Lines of credit from Austrialia, Austria, Belgium, 
Finland, and Canada recently expired with only 2.3 percent of 
available credit having been used. 

   The bankers attributed low credit absorption by Polish businesses 
to the following factors: 

   --Business borrowers lack information about the availability of 
Western credit lines. 

   --Polish banks lack interest in negotiating loans with Western 
capital; banks seek to minimize risks and prefer more profitable 
interbank transactions and government securities trading. 

   --Potential borrowers are unable to put together "credible" loan 
applications. 

   --The earmarking of many Western loans (except for PHARE and SAL 
loans) limits loan demand because proceeds must be used to by 
specific types of goods from countries providing the loaned funds. 

   --Many firms that drew on Western credit lines in the last two or 
three years are now in financial difficulty because of reduced 
domestic demand for their products. 

   --Risk avoidance and bureaucracy deter Polish governmental bodies 
from embarking on protracted loan negotiations with banks in lender 
countries; it sometimes takes nine months to negotiate credit lines. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1918 GMT 3 Jun 93; Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE 
in Polish 27 May 93 p 8, 5 Jun 93 p 1) 

   EBRD PROMISES FUNDS TO ASSIST MINE RESTRUCTURING:  On 8 June, 
EBRD representatives visiting Warsaw told Polish Deputy Minister for 
Industry and Trade, Eugeniusz Morawski, that EBRD wanted to write 
loans that would help pay for the restructuring of the Polish coal 
mining sector.  Morawski agreed that his ministry would draft a 
study on how much it would cost to shut down unprofitable mines and 
pay welfare benefits for redundant miners.  The findings would then 
be passed on to the EBRD. 

   According to the PAP news agency, however, mounting losses in the 
coal sector make it difficult to estimate realistic restructuring 
costs.  While the government earmarked 2 trillion zlotys ($120 
million) for coal restructuring in March, by April operating losses 
industry-wide had increased to 5.3 trillion zlotys.  Industry 
experts estimated that losses would total 8 trillion zlotys by the 
end of June.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1929 GMT 9 Jun 93) 

   EBRD LOANS TO WOOD, PAPER PRODUCTS FIRMS:  In mid-June, the EBRD 
wrote two loans totalling DM 46 million for two Polish companies: 
the Polspan chipboard plant in Szczecin and the Malta-Decor paper 
products company in Poznan.  The firms will use the proceeds for 
investments in increased capacity.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2045 GMT 
16 Jun 93) 

   EBRD LOAN TO DANISH JOINT VENTURE:  In mid-June, the EBRD wrote a 
loan of 6.2 million ECU to aid the modernization of a new Polish- 
Danish joint venture in the manufacture of insulating materials.  On 
11 June, the Danish firm Rockwool International AS and the state- 
owned Polish firm Izolacja pooled resources to form the joint 
venture Rockwool Polska.  The Danes hold a 51-percent stake in the 
new company.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1841 GMT 17 Jun 93) 

   DEBT FOR ENVIRONMENT SWAP WITH ITALY:  Meetings between Polish 
and Italian officials in Rome in late June resulted in an Italian 
decision to join other Paris Club members by cancelling 10 percent 
of Poland's official external debt in exchange for a Polish pledge 
to earmark the conserved resources for environmental protection. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 2100 GMT 25 Jun 93) 

   HEALTH MINISTRY QUASHES HOSPITAL'S BID FOR GERMAN LOAN:  In a 
precedent-setting case, the Ministry of Health asked the Central 
Planning Office's foreign loan review board to deny government 
guarantees for German commercial bank loan sought by a Warsaw 
hospital in the Ministry's jurisdiction. 

   The daily RZECZPOSPOLITA  reported that unnamed officials in 
other agencies were disturbed by the Health Ministry's action. 
These officials pointed out that the loan was for a relatively small 
amount (DM 0,7 million) and was earmarked for capital investment (in 
medical equipment) by a subordinate agency of the Health Ministry. 
If the German bankers were willing to lend the money, they believed 
it should be used. 

   The Health Ministry reportedly witheld its support for the loan 
because it thought the loan proceeds should be shared with other 
Polish hospitals for spending on various other worthy purposes. 
Other officials countered that German lenders would never write 
loans to be used to pay the general operating expenses of several 
hospitals.  Rather, they argue, such commercial loans are normally 
tied to specific projects backed by sound business plans.  (Warsaw 
RZECZPOSPOLITA in Polish 29 Jun 93 p 10) 

   POLAND ROLE IN IMF, WORLD BANK SEEN STRONGER:  According to RYNKI 
ZAGRANICZNE, Poland has gained a stronger say in the management of 
World Bank affairs by aligning itself with the "Swiss Group" of IMF 
and World Bank governors. 

   After joining the World Bank in 1992, Switzerland invited Poland 
to leave the "Italian Group" and join the new grouping of World Bank 
member countries headed by Switzerland.  The Swiss Group consists of 
Switzerland (26,858 votes), Poland (6,372 votes), Uzbekistan (1,649 
votes), Azerbaijan (1,174 votes), Kirghizstan (871 votes), and 
Turkmenistan (776 votes).  Polish national Jan Sulmicki serves as 
deputy executive director of the Swiss Group. 

   Markus Lusser, president of the Swiss central bank and chief of 
the "Swiss Group" in the IMF, visited Poland in early July for 
meetings with Hanna Gronkiewicz-Waltz, president of the National 
Bank of Poland, and for briefings on the Polish banking system. 
Lusser said he intended to draw on what he learned during the visit 
to advance cooperation between Poland, the IMF, and the World Bank. 
Lusser termed Poland the "most important country" in the group of 
member countries that he heads.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1550 GMT 5 
Jul 93; Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 15 Jul 93 p 3) 

   UK REINSTATES EXPORT CREDIT INSURANCE:  In early July, the UK 
Department of Trade and Industry announced that it had re-authorized 
the British insurer ECGD to guarantee loans covering exports to 
Poland.  London stopped the program in 1982 following the 
declaration of martial law in Poland.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1952 
GMT 9 Jul 93) 

   WORLD BANK LENDING RECORD UPDATED:  In mid-July, RYNKI 
ZAGRANICZNE reviewed the World Bank's ledger of lending programs for 
Poland. 

   The World Bank began making development loans to Poland in 1990. 
Since 1990, the IBRD has opened credit lines for Poland totaling 
$2.703 billion.  Of this amount, $860 million were actually 
disbursed to borrowers as of May 1993. 

   Also in May, the World Bank and Poland began wrapping up 
negotiations on opening up three new lines of credit for the 
following SAL (structural adjustment loan) projects: 

   AFSAL -- $300 million to finance agricultural development loans. 

   EFSAL -- $450 million to finance bank recapitalization. 

         --Forestry Development -- $146 million. 

   (Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 15 Jul 93 p 3) 

   MEDIA COVERS START OF IMF REVIEW MISSION:  During July, Polish 
media reportedly extensively on the beginning of the IMF's mid-year 
review of Polish economic performance.  An IMF mission came to 
Warsaw to begin the process of measuring Polish compliance with 
standby agreements reached earlier with the IMF. 

   The mission, headed by Michael Deppler, arrived in Warsaw on 5 
July to begin its regular quarterly review.  On 15 July, Jerzy 
Kropiwnicki, chief of Poland's Central Planning Office, said in a 
press interview that there were no grounds to fear that the IMF 
would not certify Polish compliance with the three-year Extended 
Fund Facility (EFF) granted in April 1991.  Kropiwnicki noted that 
both Polish and IMF experts had agreed that Poland's trade deficit 
posed no threat to standards set for the country's foreign exchange 
reserves.   On 16 July, the IMF mission announced that it had 
certified Polish economic performance over the first half of 1993 as 
being in compliance with EFF standards.  The mission also laid down 
economic indicator standards for the rest of the year. 
Certification meant that Poland was authorized to draw on the next 
tranche of IMF standby financing worth a reported $700 million, 
according to the PAP press agency. 

   Total financing available to Poland under the terms of accords 
with the IMF amounts to about 1.8 billion SDR, including 1.2 billion 
SDR per the three-year EFF and 0.6 billion under the Compensatory 
and Contingency Fund Facility (to cover emergency energy imports), 
according to a report in RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE.  (Warsaw PAP in English 
2157, 2159 GMT 15 Jul 93; Warsaw TVP Television First Program 
Network in Polish 2155 GMT 15 Jul 93; Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in 
Polish 17 Jul 93 p 1) 

   POLES REJECT LONDON CLUB DEBT REDUCTION OFFER:  At a press 
conference on 26 July, Finance Minister Jerzy Osiatynski said Poland 
could not afford to repay its London Club commercial bank debts 
under the latest debt-reduction terms offered by a Club working 
group on 19 July in London.  "Poland needs and agreement, but not at 
any price," Osiatynski declared.  The London Club offered Poland a 
28-percent debt reduction program instead of the 50-percent 
reduction sought by Poland.  The difference amounts to $2.5 billion, 
according to Osiatynski. 

   Osiatynski explained that the Polish delegation to the 19 July 
meeting in London refused to discuss the London Club proposal 
because it was "incompatible" with the three principles underlying a 
future debt settlement agreed upon in talks held in May. 

   Osiatynski cited long-term IMF and World Bank studies on Poland's 
debt service capabilities to support his argument that the London 
Club proposal was unaffordable.  While the IMF and World Bank 
contend that Poland can afford to pay $400 million annually over the 
next 30 years to service its inherited commercial bank debt, the 
latest London Club offer would translate into $600 million over the 
next few months, rising to $1 billion annually later on.  Adoption 
of these terms would lead to the "collapse" of Poland's economic 
reforms, according to Osiatynski.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2221 GMT 
19 Jul 93, 1243 GMT 26 Jul 93) 

   WORLD BANK, EIB FOREST, BANK REORGANIZATION LOANS:  Through last 
summer, Poland, the World Bank, and the EIB continued negotiations 
on two loan packages covering reforestation projects and the costs 
of restructuring Polish banks and enterprises.  The World Bank 
approved the reforestation loan in July and the bank and enterprise 
restructuring loans in October. 

   In late July, a World Bank mission came to Warsaw to discuss 
final arrangements for a loan to support reforestation in Polish 
regions suffering from excessive environmental degradation. 

   The reforestation program is based on a plan drafted by the 
Polish Ministry of Environmental Protection covering the period 
1993-1997.  The total cost of the program an estimated $335 million. 

   The World Bank proposed-to grant Poland a long-term loan of $146 
million to support the project.  Terms would be 17 years at a mean 
interest rate of 7.5 percent with a five-year grace period.  Warsaw 
was also expecting to obtain a loan of $20 million from the European 
Investment Bank -- repayable in 20 years at 7 percent with a seven- 
year grace period.  The balance of the projected total cost of $335 
million would be covered by funding from Poland's National Forests 
agency plus additional foreign grants, which are expected to total 
$22.5 million.  The Polish government would service $86 million of 
the debt to the World Bank and EIB, while the National Forests 
agency would cover the rest. 

   On 22 July, Finance Minister Osiatynski announced that the World 
Bank had approved loans to Poland totaling $750 million, including a 
reported "$300 million" for the reforestation project and "$450 
million" for bank and enterprise restructuring.  Osiatynski 
emphasized that the proceeds would be available immediately. 

   In early September, the EIB approved a loan for its share of the 
financing package covering the reforestation initiative.  The EIB 
loan was less than what Poland had expected in July -- about $15 
million instead of $20 million. 

   The World Bank approved the bank and enterprise restructuring 
loans in early October.  The $450-million loan total is to be broken 
down into two components:  $350 million to cover bank and enterprise 
reorganization or social safety nets for discharged factory 
employees and $100 million to finance the redemption of external 
Polish debt owed to foreign commercial banks.  (Warsaw RYNKI 
ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 20 Jul 93 p 2; Warsaw PAP in English 1651 GMT 
19 Jul 93, 1031 GMT 22 Jul 93, 1444 GMT 3 Sep 93, 2010 GMT 11 Oct 
93) 

   LONDON CLUB SPURNS POLISH REQUEST F0R MEETING:  In late July, the 
London Club refused a Polish request for a meeting to explain 
Warsaw's reasons for rejecting the London offer of a 28-percent debt 
reduction -- instead of the 50-percent cut sought by Poland.  Jerzy 
Krowacki, head of the Polish negotiating team, asked for the meeting 
in reaction to press statements by Jeffrey Stokely, head of the 
London Club working group on Polish debt, who said he did not 
understand Polish calculations behind the rejection of the 28- 
percent formula, as explained by Finance Minister Osiatynski during 
a 26 July press conference.  Krowacki wanted an opportunity to 
convince Stokely that a 28-percent cut in Poland's commercial bank 
debt would amount to a net reduction of only 8 percent.  (Warsaw PAP 
in English 2030 GMT 29 Jul 93) 

   STATUS OF GERMAN (HERMES) LOAN GUARANTEE PROGRAM:  As of late 
July 1993, Poland had managed to use just over half of its quota of 
export-import loan guarantees backed by the German trade finance 
institution Hermes.  Working through Hermes, the German government 
has agreed to guarantee up to DM 2.5 billion worth of financing 
loans provided by Polish commercial banks and the Polish government 
to help Polish importers pay for purchases of German raw materials 
and capital goods.  The Polish-German Credit Committee, which 
oversees implementation of the program and reviews all guaranty 
contract applications for loans over DM 20 million, held one of its 
regular meetings on 28 July. 

   The pool of capital available for Hermes loan guarantees is 
broken down into segments for short-term and medium to long-term 
loans.  As of July, Hermes had accepted contracts to guarantee loans 
worth DM 197 million out of a total quota of DM 300 million.  Of the 
DM 2.2 billion allotted for medium and long-term capital project 
loans, guarantees had been written for loans worth DM 1.648 billion. 

   A decision to carry over any unused portion of the 1993 guarantee 
quota into 1994 would require agreement of the Polish and German 
governments.  Bonn and Warsaw agreed last year to carry over the 
unused quota from 1992.  (Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 29 Jul 
93 p 1) 

   WHO'S WHO FROM THE EC IN WARSAW:  In its regular supplement on 
Polish relations with the EC, RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE publishes 
informative text/graphic sidebars designed to boost readers' 
awareness of facts and figures about EC programs and institutions. 
In July, the supplement featured a box identifying key personnel in 
the EC mission to Warsaw, including those responsible for aid and 
loan programs: 

Alexander H. Dijckmeester -- Ambassador. 

   Klaus Schmidt -- First Counsellor, Chief Coordinator of the PHARE 
program. 

   Andrew Rasbash -- Economic Counsellor. 

   Hans Glaubitz --  Counsellor for Press, Culture, and Information. 

   Dieter Birkemaier -- Legal Counsellor (responsible for managing 
social aid programs and some aspects of the PHARE program), 

   Pierre Gerard -- Agriculture Counsellor. 

   Nigel Tucker -- Administrative Attache. 

  (Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 28 Jul 93 p 3) 

   EBRD, OTHERS FINANCE GDANSK PHONE SYSTEM UPGRADE:  Along with 
American and other European banks, the EBRD will finance loans for 
the modernization of the Gdansk telephone system.  Officials 
representing AT&amp;T Network System International and Telekomunikacja 
Polska signed papers in Gdansk on 26 August giving the go-ahead for 
the $150-million joint venture project.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1745 
GMT 26 Aug 93) 

   IMF STANDBY TRANCHES NOT DRAWN:  In late August, a Finance 
Ministry officials reported that Poland planned to defer drawing on 
available IMF credit tranches earmarked to bolster foreign exchange 
reserves.  Warsaw intended to refrain from using IMF credit until 
negotiations were completed with the London Club on commercial debt 
restructuring. 

   On 15 August, the IMF suspended Poland's access to the second 
tranche of IMF credit available under the March standby agreement 
(190.4 million SDR) due to the country's failure to live up to one 
of the agreement's implementation standards regarding foreign 
exchange reserves.  Foreign exchange reserves fell by $95 million 
below the standard required by the IMF. 

   Deputy Minister of Finance Stefan Kawalec and Finance Ministry 
Foreign Department chief Krzysztof Kalicki explained that IMF credit 
lines were not being used because the interest charges are too high 
at the prevailing market rates charged by the IMF.  They observed 
that the added debt service burden was unwarranted despite the 
falloff in foreign exchange reserves, which the IMF credit 1ine is 
intened to bolster.  (Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 31 Aug 93 p 
1) 

   IMF REVIEW MISSION GIVES GOOD REPORT:  In late August, another 
IMF mission visited Warsaw to wrap up work on the institution's 
review of Polish compliance with the March standby agreement.  RYNKI 
ZAGRANICZNE and other Polish media reported that, in general, the 
mission found that Poland had met all performance criteria with the 
exception of foreign exchange reserves, which had declined below 
desirable levels. 
   At the conclusion of this mission, the Minister of Finance and 
the head of the central bank submitted a letter of intent to the 
IMF's managing director declaring Polish readiness to continue 
implementation of the standby agreement during the third and fourth 
quarters.  Implementation guidelines were to be adjusted to reflect 
current economic conditions, chiefly including the drop in foreign 
exchange reserves and the growing trade deficit. 

   While the IMF mission voiced concerns about foreign exchange and 
trade deficit issues, RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE reported that the delegation 
was favorably impressed by the 26 August decision to devalue the 
zloty by 8 percent. The central bank hoped that the devaluation 
would stem the decline in foreign exchange reserves and shrink the 
trade deficit, although the Finance Ministry realized that the move 
would also require fine-tuning in the IMF compliance guidelines. 

   On other issues, such as budget deficit management, inflation 
control, and econoniic restructuring, the IMF mission gave Poland 
high marks, according to a Finance Ministry official.  (Warsaw RYNKI 
ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 28 Aug 93 p 1, 31 Aug 93 p 1) 

   WORLD BANK RURAL INFRASTRUCTURE LOAN:  In September, the World 
Bank approved a loan of $300 million with a three-year grace period 
to support rural infrastructure development in Poland.  The proceeds 
are to be earmarked for spending on the construction of water and 
sewer lines, telephone systems, and small-scale food processing 
operations.  The "Rural Infrastructure Fund" created by the 
Agriculture Ministry will oversee dispersement of the World Bank 
loan.  (Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 11 Sep 93 p 2) 

   NEW EC CREDIT LINE FOR AGRICULTURE:  In mid-September, Alexander 
Dijckmeester, EC envoy to Poland, and Jan K. Bielecki, Polish 
Minister for EC Integration, signed an agreement opening a new line 
of EC credit intended to support capital investment in agriculture 
and the food processing industry.  Three Polish commercial banks in 
Poznan, Wroclaw, and Warsaw will process loan applications from 
prospective Polish borrowers.  The credit line is for 3 million ECU 
over 12 years, with disbursements in zlotys or other currencies. 
Individual loans would be limited to a maximum of 200,000 ECU. 

At the signing ceremony, Dijckmeester commented that the EC hoped 
that Polish farmers would now have easier access to EC credit on the 
assumption that "all technical obstacles" had been removed.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 1357 GMT 14 Sep 93) 

   UNUSED EC LOANS CARRY OVER TO STRUDER PROGRAM:  In a September 
edition of its regular supplement on EC issues, RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE 
published a detailed review of the accomplishments of the EC-funded 
"Program for the Support of Small and Medium-sized Business 
Development." 

   Founded in 1990 with an original PHARE appropriation of 25 
million ECU, the Program is managed through a government-held 
foundation called the "Cooperation Fund."  The government set up the 
foundation in 1990 to direct all foreign aid aimed at promoting 
democracy and free markets.  Of the 25 million ECU total, 19 million 
ECU were designated for direct lending to small and medium-sized 
firms, while 6 million ECU were set aside for non-governmental 
organizations, trade associations, and training centers serving the 
business sector. 

   The Cooperation Fund has focused on aiding private sector 
development in Poland.  Given the relatively small funding level of 
the EC-sponsored business development program, Polish and EC 
officials decided that it would operate initially as a pilot project 
targeted on specific regions -- Gdansk, Lodz, and Lower Silesia. 
The program set aside 19 million ECU as a credit line available to 
Polish small and medium-sized businesses for various capital 
investment projects.  To be eligible for loans financed through the 
program firms had to be 51-percent privately held and employ no more 
than 100 workers.  Applicants were also required to use their own 
capital to finance 15 percent of the cost of a given project.  While 
the loan limit was set at 250,000 ECU, program managers fenced off 
most of the available loan capital into blocks of 50,000 ECU in 
hopes of writing loans for as many firms as possible. 

   With a view to improving the efficiency of the Polish banking 
system, Polish commercial banks were tapped to handle loan 
processing.  Loan interest rates originally ranged between 12 and 15 
percent, including Polish bank margins.  Current interest rates are 
set at LIBOR levels for the ECU plus 4 percent.  Loans are disbursed 
in foreign exchange and repayable in local currency.  Loans are due 
in seven years with possible grace periods of up to two years. 

   Fears that the credit line of 19 million ECU would fall far short 
of demand in Poland's emerging private business sector proved 
unfounded.  The program has only managed to disburse around 10 
percent (approximately 2 million ECU) of the available credit. 
RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE blamed the banking system, businesses, and 
changing economic conditions for the low usage of this Western 
credit pool.  Banks reportedly believed that the loan processing was 
to time-consuming, while the loans themselves were viewed as too 
risky.  Meanwhile, businesses had difficulties filling out 
applications and drafting business plans for review by bank credit 
committees.  Firms were also seen as being overly cautious about 
making any investment commitments.  Finally, the program grew less 
competitive over time as regular commercial bank loans became more 
readily available under the same terms. 

   The Polish government worked to retain the unused EC credit for 
future use even though the credit line was due to expire at the end 
of 1993.  Warsaw finally persuaded Brussels to merge the untapped 
credit pool with funds appropriated for the EC's newer aid program 
-- STRUDER.  (Warsaw RYNI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 16 Sep 93 pp 3, 5) 

   SEEKING WAYS TO TAP, PRESERVE UNUSED CREDIT LINES:  In a mid- 
September issue, RYNKI ZAGRANIZCNE published a feature reviewing the 
reasons for Poland's low absorption of Western credit and options 
for making better use of this resource. 

   The journal quoted Zbigniew Kopyra, chief of the Loan 
Applications Review Agency in the Central Planning Office, on the 
need to preserve and open up Western credit channels.  Since many of 
these credit lines opened under various assistance programs are due 
to expire soon, Kopyra urged the government to keep them open by 
continuing to pay loan access fees.  Kopyra claimed that these fees 
do not strain the budget because they only amount to a small 
fraction of the total credit available.  Kopyra also pressed the 
government to renegotiate loan agreements in order to obtain an 
extension of the deadline for the expiration of credit lines.  He 
also believed that the terms under which loans are made to 
individual borrowers should also be rewritten in order to build more 
"flexibility" into the lending programs.  (Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE 
in Polish 16 Sep 93 p 7) 

   EBRD FINANCING FOR FRANCO-POLISH SANITARY PROJECT:  The EBRD 
intends to finance part of the costs of a Polish-French joint 
venture project involving the construction of a new sewage treatment 
plant in Lodz.  The EBRD loan is preferential, tied to covering part 
of the 32-million ECU price tag of a design study for the new sewage 
plant by the French partner in the project, Compagne General des 
Eaux.  Compagne General and Bank Societe General of France have 
formed a consortium to cover the rest of the design costs.  Terms 
are 15 years with a grace period of three years.  The loan will be 
repaid in part from profit margins on the treatment plant's rate 
charges. 

   The Lodz sewage treatment facility is billed as Poland's largest 
environmental protection investment to date -- at a projected total 
construction cost of about $75 million.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2148 
GMT 16 Sep 93) 

   EC LOAN APPLICATION RULES REVIEWED:  In late September, RYNKI 
ZAGRANICZNE ran a feature article reviewing guidelines, rules, and 
procedures that business applicants must follow when applying for 
investment loans through Polish banks funded by EC credit lines. 
The article was apparently written as a reference aid for Polish 
businessmen. 

   In an end-to-end overview, the author of the piece, Halina 
Brdulak, describes the charter and duties of official Polish loan 
application review bodies and explains all of the documentary 
information that must accompany loan applications.  Brdulak reminded 
readers that the "Loan Applications Rating Commission" under the 
Central Planning Office does not disburse loans, but rather reviews 
these applications for capital investment loans, funded either by 
foreign or domestic credit lines, for consistency with government 
macroeconomic policies.  With a macroeconomic blessing from the 
national loan committee, individual commercial banks evaluate the 
microeconomic merits of a given capital project before approving a 
loan and disbursing proceeds. 

   Brdulak listed two of the "most frequent mistakes" made by Polish 
businesses when applying for loans backed by EC credit lines to 
finance capital investments.  First,  applicants seeking capital to 
finance joint ventures often fail to check up on the credit ratings 
of the prospective foreign partners.  Second, businesses are sloppy 
and unprofessional in filling out loan applications and assembling 
other supporting documentation.  Brdulak recommends that loan 
applicants should hire professional consulting firms to help them 
with loan paperwork.  (Warsaw RYNKI ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 21 Sep 93 
p 6) 

   EIB, AUSTRIAN BANK PLAN JOINT LOAN:  In September, the EIB and 
its Austrian counterpart -- Investkreditbank -- were working on 
plans to lend 100 million ECU in untied funds to the Polski Bank 
Rozwoju (Polish Development Bank).  The Polish bank would use the 
funds to make various small business loans.  EIB's president, Sir 
Brian Unwin, also believes that such "all-purpose loans" help 
promote growth in Poland's banking industry.  (Warsaw RYNKI 
ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 25 Sep 93 p 1) 

   GERMAN BANK OPPOSES DEBT REDUCTION:  While he favored a rapid 
rescheduling of Polish commercial bank debt, Martin Kohlhaussen, 
president of Germany's Commerzbank, said he is opposed to the 50- 
percent debt reduction sought by Poland, according to the PAP news 
agency.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2228 GMT 28 Sep 93) 

   IMF, WORLD BANK CONCERNS ABOUT NEW GOVERNMENT'S POLICIES: On 29 
September, outgoing Finance Minister Osiatynski met with senior IMF 
and World Bank officials in Washington for talks that dwelled on 
speculation about Poland's future economic policies after the 
victory of left-wing parties in the 19 September elections. 

   Osiatynski sought to reassure the IMF and World Bank that it 
would be difficult for the then yet-to-be formed government to 
reverse standing economic reform policies.  To do so, he explained, 
would jeopardize Poland's chances for securing the second part of 
the Paris Club debt reduction program, in addition to torpedoing 
talks with the London Club and breaking agreements reached with the 
IMF.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2219 GMT 29 Sep 93) 

   WORLD BANK ADVERTISES THIRD WORLD PROJECT CONTRACTS:  RYNKI 
ZAGRANICZNE periodically publishes World Bank invitations to bid on 
development project contracts in third countries.  In this issue, 
the journal listed Bank-financed projects in Guyana, Brazil, Turkey, 
Philippines, Kenya, Bangladesh, and Pakistan.  (Warsaw RYNKI 
ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 30 Sep 93 p 4) 

   IFIs MAY REWARD LONDON CLUB SETTLEMENT:  Returning to Warsaw on 3 
October from the annual World Bank-IMF summit in Washington, 
outgoing Finance Minister Osiatynski told reporters that 
international financial institutions promised Poland more credit "in 
case we sign an agreement with the London Club."  The IMF and World 
Bank reportedly made the offer on the condition that Warsaw not 
retreat from current economic reform and financial discipline 
policies.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1838 GMT 3 Oct 93) 

   SLD EXPECTATIONS FROM WORLD BANK:  On 11 October, World Bank Vice 
President Ernest Stern met with SLD (Democratic Left Alliance) 
officials in Warsaw for an exchange of views on the economic policy 
goals of the newly elected Polish government and future bilateral 
relations.  Officials of the SLD's coalition partner PSL (Polish 
Peasant Party) as well as experts from the UP (Union of Labor) also 
attended. 

   Stern rated Poland's overall chances for obtaining new credit 
sources as "good."  He cautioned, however, that improving economic 
performance has a downside.  If the country is no longer 
"impoverished," creditor groups such as the London Club may no 
longer be willing to agree to debt reductions on the order of 50 to 
60 percent. 

   SLD leader Jozef Oleksy listed his party's objectives in terms of 
cooperation with the World Bank: 

   --Collaboration in drafting a study on the causes of inflation in 
Poland.  The SLD wants to pinpoint the impact of cost-push inflation 
and the potential effects of a further increase in energy prices. 

   --Collaboration in examining the reasons for Poland's low rate of 
foreign loan absorption.  In addition to deficiences on the part of 
prospective Polish borrowers, the SLD is also concerned about the 
complexity of processing bank loans that tap into World Bank credit 
lines. 

   --Securing World Bank loans for the modernization of firms 
included in the mass privatization program. 

   --Obtaining World Bank support for reform of the entitlements and 
social security system.  The SLD deems World Bank activity in this 
area to be "inadequate." 

   --World Bank financing to support guarantees for export loans and 
loans to small and medium-sized businesses. 

   --Negotiation of World Bank loans to support road and housing 
construction. 

   --World Bank support for Polish efforts to secure greater market 
access in Western Europe. 

   In reply, Stern acknowledged that the World Bank is "very much in 
favor" of discussing difficulties in obtaining World Bank loans.  As 
for helping Poland to improve EU market access, he said there was 
little the World Bank could do.  (Warsaw RZECZPOSPOLITA in Polish 12 
Oct 93 p 5) 

   EBRD FINANCING FOR PRIVATIZATION:  In October, the EBRD set aside 
$300-400 million to be used for recapitalization loans to firms 
slated for participation in mass privatization.  The bank is also 
reported ready to lend $60 million to finance the working capital 
needs of the national investment funds participating in the program. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1441 GMT 14 Oct 93) 

   GOVERNMENT REPORT ON LOW WESTERN CREDIT ABSORPTION:  An October 
issue of the business weekly ZYCIE GOSPODARCZE summarized a 
government study which analyzed the reasons why Poland has been slow 
to take advantage of approved credit lines from Western governments 
and international financial institutions.  The authors of the study 
--"a Special Task Force For the Study of Foreign Loan Absorption" 
reporting to the Polish Prime Minister -- concluded that the fault 
for low loan absorption rate lies more with Poland than with Western 
lenders. 

   Only a fraction of loans approved by Western governments and 
international financial institutions, such as the World Bank and the 
European Investment Bank, have translated into actual disbursements 
to Polish borrowers.  Looking at total foreign lending to Poland 
during 1990-1992, the task force cited loan absorption figures that 
were generally consistent with those reported to Polish borrowers 
and international lenders who attended the banking conference held 
in Warsaw in June.  The authors of the government report found that 
Western official lenders had approved loans to Poland totaling $8.3 
billion.  Of this sum, the lenders had actually opened available 
credit lines worth $6.5 million.  Over this period, intermediary 
Polish financial institutions drew on these lines to approve 
applications for loans valued at $1.9 billion.  However, actual 
disbursements of proceeds to Polish borrowers only came to "less 
than half" of the latter amount. 

   The Premier's loan task force broke out the external and internal 
barriers to faster absorption of Western loans.  The authors used 
the term "external" to refer to problems caused by Western lenders 
and the term "internal" to denote Polish barriers to fuller 
utilization of Western credit lines. 

   Lender Problems -- The task force blamed bureaucracy and 
procedural obstacles -- rather than lack of good faith -- for 
Western tardiness in approving loans to Poland.  The authors singled 
out the World Bank as a prime example of an institution encumbered 
with overlong and complicated loan application and planning 
procedures.  They also found that $2 million seems to be the 
threshold for the onset of significant delays in loan processing. 
World Bank loans are further complicated by requirments for 
compliance with IMF conditions on Polish economic performance. 

   Borrower Problems -- The task force tagged Poland with most of 
the blame for the slow utilization of Western official loans.  They 
listed all of the internal obstacles to faster loan absorption under 
three main headings: 

   --"Environmental" Factors -- The authors laid most of the blame 
for the tardy absorption of Western loans to problems in Poland's 
overall "economic environment" -- attributable chiefly to stumbling 
blocks and delays in the privatization process.  They pointed out 
that uncertain privatization timetables complicate long-term 
investment and borrowing strategies.  State-owned proprietaries that 
may not be around in two or three years are simply unable to qualify 
for long-term capital loans if the lender has no input into their 
eventual privatization.  Another "environmental" obstacle is that 
state-owned firms slated for privatization are reluctant to borrow 
because lower debt loads translate into higher share prices when 
they go on the block.  Polish laws that delay and complicate lender 
efforts to recover bad debts are another deterrent to the approval 
of loans to specific Polish businesses and projects. 

   --Problems In the Banking Sector -- Many of the barriers to 
faster absorption of Western loans reflect problems that are unique 
to Polish financial institutions.  For example, the lack of trained 
personnel makes its difficult for Polish banks to evaluate loan 
applicatons properly.  Other problems are more institutional in 
nature.  For example, capital requirements levied by Poland's 
central bank, such as an 8-percent return on equity, tends to 
discourage commercial banks from drawing on foreign capital to make 
long-term loans that inflate loan assets beyond central bank 
guidelines.  Capital adequacy shortfalls (estimated at 24 trillion 
zlotys in September 1993) in the Polish banking sector make it more 
difficult for banks to write new loans and remain within the 
profitability guidelines set by the central bank.  Polish banks also 
compete with Western lenders because they feel compelled to make 
their "own" foreign exchange loans by drawing on private foreign 
exchange deposits -- on which banks pay high interest rates. 

   --Problems In the Business Sector -- Demand for loans in the 
business sector is low for a variety of reasons reflecting the 
particular situations of individual firms and sectors.  Bank loan 
requirements, undercapitalization of firms, and uncertainty about 
future ownership status are seen as barriers to the absorption of 
Western loans.  The authors of the government report pointed out, 
for example, that the shortage of capital in the business sector 
makes it difficult for many firms to qualify for investment loans. 
Firms are typically required to fund 20 - 50 percent of total 
capital project costs out of their own pockets in order to qualify 
for loans to cover the rest.  State-owned proprietorships, on the 
other hand, are passive:  they are not borrowing anywhere because 
they do not want to invest until privatization issues are settled. 
In addition to lack of experience in filling out loan application 
forms, some businesses shy away from foreign-financed credit by 
financing their operations from other sources, such as preferential 
government loans designed for agriculture.  Moreover, the roughly 35 
percent of all privately owned businesses that are in the retail 
trade sector have no need for long-term financing. 

   The authors concluded that accelerated privatization is the 
single most important key to breaking the logjam preventing Poland 
from tapping the pool of loan capital pledged by official Western 
instititutions. 

   Accompanying its overview of the government's study on Western 
loan utilization problems, ZYCIE GOSPODARCZE published the table 
shown on the following page.  The table illustrates patterns in 
Polish borrowing from Western sources by institutions, availability 
dates, loan amounts, loan purposes, and loans actually disbursed. 
(Warsaw ZYCIE GOSPODARCZE in Polish No 43, 24 Oct 93 p 20) 
(At this point, the hard-copy version of this report contains a 
graphic) 

   IMF ENVOY MEETS NEW LEADERS:  In early November, Markus Radlauer, 
IMF Representative in Warsaw, met with leaders of the new SLD-PSL 
coalition government. 

   On 3 November, Radlauer met with the new Polish Prime Minister, 
Waldemar Pawlak for discussions about future bilateral relations. 

   Pawlak and Radlauer laid out their respective positions and 
expectations regarding Polish economic policy and the extent of 
future cooperation with the IMF.  Pawlak pledged that Polish 
planning and budget policies would strive to lay a groundwork for 
continued growth, while also making allowances for "social factors." 
Pawlak stressed that social justice and economic growth are mutually 
complementary. 

   Radlauer accented the need for Poland to maintain fiscal 
discipline in its 1994 budget as "the most important factor for 
cooperation with the IMF." 

   On 4 November, Radlauer met with the new Sejm speaker Jozef 
Olesky (SLD). 
   At a press conference after their meeting, Oleksy announced that 
Poland and the IMF would start negotiations in December on policy 
issues concerning which Warsaw is seeking IMF relief.  Oleksy 
mentioned that he told Radlauer that Warsaw wants the IMF to be 
more flexible" in its stands regarding the Polish budget deficit, 
energy prices, and interest rates.  In particular, Oleksy referred 
to the new government's desire for greater latitude in shifting 
funds between budget accounts in order to meet social policy 
objectives.   (Warsaw PAP in English 1722 GMT 3 Nov 93, 2017 GMT 4 
Nov 93) 

   NO CHANGE IN NEW GOVERNMENT'S LONDON CLUB POSITION:  Krzysztof 
Krowacki, head of the Polish negotiating team in talks with the 
London Club, announced in early November that the new government's 
position on Polish commercial bank debt reduction was unchanged from 
that of the previous government. 

   After a meeting with Ernst-Moritz Lippe, the new chief of the 
London Club working group in charge of the Polish debt issue, 
Krowacki predicted that a final settlement could be reached in "two 
or three months."  (Warsaw PAP in English 1936 GMT 4 Nov 93) 
WORLD BANK STUDYS URBAN TRANSIT LOAN PROGRAM:  A World Bank team 
of experts visited Poland in November to work on a feasibility study 
for a loan program earmarked for urban mass transit development in 
six Polish cities:  Katowice, Krakow, Wroclaw, Poznan, Lodz, and 
Gdansk.  The Bank deems Katowice most in need of assistance in this 
area. 

   While team leader Slobodan Mitrovic said it was too early to 
estimate the value of the lending program, he indicated the project 
should be designed to focus efforts on making more efficient use of 
existing urban transportation assets -- as opposed to the Polish 
preference for building new systems from the ground up.  (Warsaw PAP 
in English 2033 GMT 10 Nov 93) 

   EBRD OFFICIAL FORECASTS 'MAJOR' NEW LOANS:  On 15 November, EBRD 
representative Yves Fortein met with Premier Pawlak to review 
existing EBRD investments in Poland and to discuss new initiatives. 

   With its focus on supporting privatization, infrastructure 
development, and environmental protection, the EBED, to date, has 
invested around $600 million in 26 capital projects around Poland. 
Most loans are managed under the umbrella of the "Stabilization, 
Restrucuturing, and Privatization Program." 

   Speaking to reporters after their meeting, Pawlak emphasized the 
importance of EBRD support for financial sector reforms involving 
banks, insurance companies, and export insurance companies. 

   Both Pawlak and Fortein noted that negotiations are under way on 
some "very major loans" from the EBRD to support additional projects 
in Poland's private and public sectors.  Fortein said loan contracts 
might be ready for signing before Christmas.  (Warsaw RYNKI 
ZAGRANICZNE in Polish 16 Nov 93 p 8; Warsaw PAP in Polish 1132 GMT 
15 Nov 93) 

   PREMIER, WALESA MEET IMF DEPUTY MANAGER:  On 16 and 17 November, 
IMF Deputy Managing Director Richard D. Erb visited Warsaw for 
meetings with Premier Pawlak, President Walesa, and others. 

   After meeting with Erb on 16 November, Pawlak told a press 
conference that he foresaw "great opportunities" for increased 
cooperation with the IMF.  Pawlak concluded that the IMF has 
accepted his government's economic policy priorities. 

   Erb told reporters at the same press conference that IMF 
"flexibility" on the economic performance guidelines set for Poland 
"will be of lesser importance" provided that the new government's 
policies lead to substantial economic growth.  Erb rated Polish 
economic growth as a "major IMF concern," according the news agency 
PAP. 

   President Walesa reassured Erb about the continuity of Polish 
economic reforms at a meeting on 17 November, according to 
presidential press spokesperson Andrzej Drzycimski.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 1039 GMT, 1301 GMT 16 Nov 93; 1137 GMT 17 Nov 93) 

   FOREIGN LENDING INSUFFICIENT, SAYS PLANNING CHIEF:  On 24 
November, Zbigniew Kopyra, Director of the Central Planning Office, 
addressed a seminar in Warsaw on reasons for Poland's low 
utilization of foreign credit lines. 

   In Kopyra's view, the amount of foreign credit currently 
available to Poland -- "$3.6 billion" -- is not enough "to 
restructure the entire economy." 

   Polish borrowers and foreign lenders share the blame for low 
credit absorption in Poland, according to Kopyra.  Lack of 
experience and capital on the part of Polish companies and 
bureacuracy in the Polish government are bad enough, he said, but 
lenders also contribute to the problem with "discouraging" and 
preferential" loan terms. (Warsaw PAP in English 1702 GMT 24 Nov 
93) 

   BULGARIAN LONDON CLUB DEAL NOTED:  Speaking to the press on 29 
November, Deputy Finance Minister and chief London Club negotiator 
Krzysztof Krowacki commented on Bulgaria's recent settlement with 
the London Club of commercial banks -- resulting in a 50-percent 
debt reduction.  While he acknowledged that Bulgaria was negotiating 
with a completely different group of banks within the London Club, 
Krowacki hoped nevertheless that the Club's Polish working group 
would "draw conclusions" from the deal. 

   Krowacki indicated that there is "chance" for another round of 
talks with the London Club before the end of the year.  He observed, 
however, that it would be premature to set a specific date for 
another meeting.  Krowacki met with the chair of the London Club 
working group, Ernst-Moritz Lippe of Dresdner Bank, to discuss the 
timing of another negotiating round.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1258 
GMT 29 Nov 93) 

   FINANCE MINISTER SCORES LONDON CLUB POSITION:  In an interview 
for the Warsaw daily RZECZPOSPOLITA published in early December, 
Marek Borowski, Minister of Finance and Deputy Premier in the newly 
elected government, criticized recent statements by London Club 
principals regarding the Polish debt reduction issue. 

   In its introduction to the interview, RZECZPOSPOLITA highlighted 
earlier comments on prospects for a Polish debt settlement by 
officials of Dresdner Bank, who have taken over management of 
negotiations with Poland.  The paper quoted Dresdner Bank chairman 
Juergen Sarrazin stating that a 50-percent reduction of Poland's 
debt is "out of the question."  Dresdner Bank's Bernhard Walter -- 
in charge of actual negotiations with the Polish side -- sounded a 
somewhat different note with the observation that a debt settlement 
would depend on the health of the Polish economy. 

   In his interview with RZECZPOSPOLITA, Borowski voiced his 
impatience and disappointment with these statements and, in general, 
with Dresdner Bank for its role in the debt talks.  After initial 
expectations that Dresdner Bank would bring more vigor to the 
negotiations, Borowski noted that Poland now hears only what it has 
heard all along from the London Club -- declarations about what 
Poland will not receive instead of "terms we have to meet so as to 
make an agreement possible."  Borowski stressed that Poland has been 
waiting for five months -- since Dresdner Bank took over the 
negotiations -- for new concrete options for a final settlement.  In 
place of a "realistic proposal," however, Poland only hears "blunt 
statements made in advance about what we will not receive." 

   Borowski continues to maintain that the London Club has not lived 
up to the "general terms" of a future accord worked out with the 
London Club in May.  Reviewing the three principles which Poland 
believes were agreed to in May, Borowski stressed that a settlement 
must be comprehensive, reflective of Poland's short and long-term 
ability to pay, and acknowledge Poland's "other contractual 
obligations."  In view of the current state of the economy and the 
state of play in the internal debate over future economic policy, 
the Finance Minister stressed that the country's ability to make 
major" payments on commercial bank debt would be limited through 
1997.  Moreover, after 1997, Borowski said that Poland had "no 
intention" of neglecting "ever-increasing obligations to other 
creditor groups." 

   Borowski closed the interview by remarking that the London Club's 
hard line in the debt reduction talks has caused its commercial bank 
members to lose money in forfeited debt collections.  He noted that 
if the Club had accepted Poland's 1991 offer to make annual payments 
of $500 million, the country's commercial bank creditors would have 
recouped "$1.5 billion by now."  (Warsaw RZECZPOSPOLITA in Polish 7 
Dec 93) 
ELAG/07 January/ECONF/East Europe Division/ta 14/0115z jan 

